I found this apple peeler, corer slicer at Bed Bath & Beyond. After a coupon, I paid less than $15.00 for it. I love it! I've been busily making apple crisps, sauteed apples over ice cream and I have to say that this gadget is going to be used a lot! This morning, I saw this recipe posted on Relish Magazine's Facebook Fan Page and I jumped out of my chair and into the kitchen-- excited to make use of my newest toy kitchen tool. This dish took, literally, 15 minutes to prepare. I preheated the oven to 450F and then grabbed one Granny Smith Apple...
While this minister was repairing the HDB, another guy began to repair his previous work in the Health. He began to repair the subsidy granted to PR. It was found that the subsidy given to PR was too high. So he began to scale it down. But this repair might have a problem, too slow and too little. It planned only to scale down in a few years. One reason is that there are a lot of foreign spouse might suffer. What in the repair failed is why don’t they grant the PR spouses citizen?
So this is a sonata made from four movements which combine texts with different pieces of piano music. At the post-show discussion, the extravagantly gifted An-Ting Chang, pianist and instigator of the project, explained how she had been frustrated at the way classical music was cut up and used in plays, and she had wanted to find something better.
Regardless, moats are an impressive sight to behold, and any building that calls for such design is likely quite important and/or expensive. While many of the moats are found in Europe, we also check out Asia and even touch down in Miami for a contemporary spin on this largely medieval phenomenon. Enjoy!
4.When I was 6 I moved to Dominica (Caribbean island) with my mom while she attended medical school. This is one of my fondest memories! I loved it there and hope to go back for a visit one day.
A pair of leggings underneath my pyjamas? Check
And of course there's more room in the church for Megan to dance!
Email Address:
She is thrust into a death match.
The two Kims were both ambitious champions of democratization struggle, having begun their political careers in very young age. Kim Young-Sam became a National Assembly member at mere 26 years old, and was house-arrested and survived assassination attempts in the course of fighting against the dictatorships of Park Chung-Hee and Chun Doo-Hwan. Kim Dae-Jung likewise began his career young, becoming a National Assembly member as a 37-year-old. Kim Dae-Jung ran for president against Park Chung-Hee in 1970, and remarkably lost by less than a million votes, in an election that was clearly rigged in favor of the incumbent dictator. He would also survive multiple assassination attempts, and had to walk with a cane for the rest of his life.
(53) Aramaic is as old as Hebrew and was widely spoken in the Near East; from about 1000B.C.E. onward it began to replace the native language of the Assyrian conquerors within the empire they had created.
A second full-page editorial appeared in January through March 1949 cover-dated issues (on the newsstands starting Fall of 1948). This editorial directly addressed the raging debate about comic books in the pages of the aforementioned Saturday Review and pointedly mentions Dr. Wertham by name this time. The editorial quotes a letter from the July 24th issue by David Pace Wigransky, a 14 year old comics reader, who intelligently and logically refutes Wertham, explaining that finding a juvenile delinquent as a comic reader proves nothing as the vast millions of America’s youth who read comics are “not” juvenile delinquents. The editorial ends with a claim that Marvel Comics are “good comics” and again touts Dr. Thompson’s endorsement on the first page of every comic they published, strategically countering like a chess game, pitting one psychiatrist against another.
As of the 21st, 8805 people are confirmed dead and 12,664 people are still missing. Seeing many people look for their missing family members is heart breaking. It is said that it could take up to 5 years to rebuild from the disastrous earthquake and tsunami.
German Chancellor Konrad Adenauer in 1963 at the sight of the Berlin Wall
… another video to run along side my thoughts.
Finding my way back
What you have to realise is that, disparate and cruel as all these game mechanics are, they’re all pulling in the same direction. They try and foster something in a player that no other game I’ve played has ever dared to deliberately go near.
Then something jumped out of the void.
The Robert Half Professional Employment Report is based on telephone interviews with more than 4,000 U.S.-based C-level executives and other leaders in a variety of fields, who are asked about their hiring plans and general level of optimism for the upcoming quarter. Survey respondents include more than 1,400 chief financial officers (CFOs); 1,400 chief information officers (CIOs); 500 senior human resources managers; 100 lawyers at law firms and 100 corporate lawyers; and 125 advertising executives and 375 marketing executives, all of whom have hiring authority. The Robert Half Professional Employment Report is the first quarterly executive survey of its size and scope to concentrate exclusively on professional-level hiring.
- LeBron James points/rebs/assists (-3.5) vs. Deion Branch rec yards: -115
A petition has been started a few days ago asking the Mayor to issue a stop work order at PS 29 until summer vacation. The petition also asks for changes to codes when it comes to constructions and repair in city schools. Why do laws allow for work that presents potential for harm to children (and teachers, and administrators) to be done when school is in session?"
It was just... just... like in a horror movie! It freaked us out! So that's how and why this picture got taken : D
This is where you and I come in, not-so-gentle reader.
US astronomers have discovered an Earth-sized planet that they think might be habitable, orbiting a nearby star, and believe there could be many more planets like it in space.
I know this doesn’t have a lot to do with my normal posts on this blog, but I truly believe pets complete a family, and a home. And today Joe & I lost our first pet.
Small saucepan with lid
now normally you would start with hello, but were going to leave those till the end,anyway where was i, ahem yes , so after nearly three years blogging for HELLO PROJECT XTREME its time for the blog to come to a close, its not something i decided overnight i might say, it has taken some thought and i do have my reasons.
You're free to move things in and out of your cart until it closes near the end of the month. For September this date is the 16th.
What do these places look like that he is describing?
These talking pictures
“These violent procedures can happen up to the ninth month of pregnancy,” Littlejohn told LifeSiteNews.com. “Sometimes the women themselves die along with their full term babies. Forced abortion is China’s war against women. It is official government rape.”
Name: OSHA 10 Hour General Industry Certification Course with Study Guide
And then we go back to the US, the land of the free and home of the Doublemint Twins. Where else would you find a 30 story, 130m tall monument to chewing gum: the Wrigley Building in Chicago, as seen in this vintage postcard view.
These issues have particular relevance for the study of beer and pubs, because at the time, a lot of this shit just didn't get written down. Whenever the yard of ale was invented, and for whatever purpose, no one whose work survives thought it worth recording. So what are you going to do? It obviously was invented by someone, at some point, so we are not wrong to speculate on what did happen.
*Ice cube trays
He found an author writing his life,
Membership Records: Meticulously kept records of every ordinance, church disclipinary action, and deaths for a particular member. (Note: “Member” refers to anyone who has ever been born to a church member or was baptized so they could play baseball, including unreported dead. Knowledge of one’s membership is not required.)
What I thought of the DJing: The first time I went, Beto Ortiz DJ'd and did, I think, a perfectly reasonable job delivering the basics, just as he does at his own milonga. I was happy to dance any tanda. The second time, Nikki DJ'd in between being on the door. She plays tandas and cortinas in the traditional format, but it can't have her full attention. Sometimes other DJ's are employed; you can check on the website. The week of writing [sorry, drafting - Chris Jordan is DJing the week of publication], Asta will be DJing.
What about you? How do you go about your goals?
Engine: Homicidal seclusion(B), Predator’s gambit(B)
Not too many of these couple pics floating around! DramaQueen shot this on the day of our 22nd Anniversary last August. It's probably one of the few anniversaries that I have a photo of us (GASP!)
We reviewed the itinerary posted… a scene at the steakhouse across the street, a street fight, a speeding car throwing someone out on the curb….ooohhh, how exciting!!
Try saying that three times fast!
Well, that's about all for me tonight!
Every outcome we experience in life is the result of how we have responded to an earlier event (or events) in our lives.
The title should have sufficiently warned you.
Web site: www.mcommstv.com
And now (insert drumroll here), a picture of the front now...
as the expect in sentencing cousins to death
the purpose of hijab is to cover our aurat and wearing it makes it obvious to everyone that we are muslim whereas dressing up, wearing make up, looking pretty basically is only for our self-satisfaction.
There was a nice hop forward taste that didn’t overwhelm the palate and faded quickly into citrus and orange flavors. The following sips became less hoppy and began to let out more yeast, citrus and maybe some tart flavors. Definitely a very drinkable beer that wasn’t as light as I was expecting and contained some very nice flavors.
It was a wonderful weekend!!! Ken only worked occasionally, via laptop or phone. Saturday we laid in bed, drank coffee and watched the news. Then Bella went to the spa and we had about 3 hours to ourselves. We went shopping for a wheelchair.
Jackson enters Big Daddy’s Pub and looks around. Given that it’s early evening, the place is only half full.
Funny how things run in families, freckles, blue eyes, an overwhelming love of cake etc etc.
Super thanks to everyone who played along with us in challenge 73.. we appreciate you very much and loved seeing your creations. You are truly part of the make-up of sassy cheryl fans!!
Waking up, waking up to these streets;
Fruit and vegetables are your friends on this program. If you are having a craving or feeling hungry have some carrots, celery. If you want a something to dip into it usually 2 tbsp. is a serving size for ranch dressing or other dressings and is 2-4 points depending on the dressing. Sometimes when you are out at a friend’s house or a restaurant you will have to estimate how many points something is. When I am out to eat and I do not know what the points are for something I will go the safe route and order a house salad with dressing on the side. Then I will order a seasoned chicken dish or a seafood dish. My husband and I always make sure to ask the waiter or waitress for no butter on all the foods. One local steakhouse brushes butter on their steak. That butter on that steak can pack on about 2-4 points that I would rather use on a delicious chocolate pudding cup. When I know where I will be eating out I will go to the restaurant’s website and plan my meal out.
Bullying is the new big thing (Just did a google news search and there are 8,840 stories in the past hour). It’s now why kids kill themselves. It’s why people quit jobs. It’s why people go home unhappy. It’s why they then take their work life out on their families.
“For this year’s total to be the third highest in the history of the offering is remarkable given the economic challenges that continue to impact many across the U.S.,” said Wanda Lee, Woman’s Missionary Union (WMU) executive director/treasurer. “It is truly a testimony to the faithfulness of God and the deep-rooted commitment among Southern Baptists to share Jesus with those around the world who have yet to hear of His love. We are grateful for WMU leaders and members who champion the missions cause in their churches through personal involvement and by urging Southern Baptists to give sacrificially and pray fervently for missions.”
So here is my creation...I decided to use my scor-pal to create a 'lattice' design...but wouldn't you know it...I just went a bought the coolest new MS Punch yesterday that would have been perfect for this challenge....but, obviously, I already made my card!!! Guess I'll just have to make another!
BubTar is rarely sick, but he got sick last week and we realized exactly how much of a hassle it is that he cannot swallow pills when he threw up in the sink TWICE when trying to take liquid meds. Sooo we decided to do some skill-building and practice the art of pill swallowing. I bought mini-Chiclets and TicTacs and had him practice swallowing those. He got the Chiclets pretty quickly, but struggled a little with the TicTacs. By the second day, he was able to swallow the TicTacs after a few tries and the day after that, he was swallowing them first try! He was so proud! :)
Over Christmas my dad was telling some stories from a life pretty much spent on or around the sea. My father was with the Merchant Navy for around 16 years (from the age of 16 until 32), starting off as a galley boy. The Merchant Navy consisted of various private shipping companies, but my father worked pretty much exclusively for the Cunard line.
half mad, saying over and over:
Conditioning wise, I feel great. I ran last Saturday’s 20 miler and felt strong enough to run the last couple of miles in under 7:50 min/mile pace, which is faster than my goal pace for the marathon. This week coming up is the last really hard week of training and then it is time to taper. At this point, I need to start thinking about what I will wear during the marathon, and things to pack for the weekend in Philly!
8. Birthdays and growing older in general.
Just before Easter I started to lose my discipline and my momentum. Maybe I'd been pushing too hard and burned myself out. Maybe I wasn't pushing hard enough.
Descrição: In this lab, you will learn how Windows Server “8″ can provide storage remotely to any machine. You will build clusters using shared storage, build iSCSI high-availability instances, and observe application IO continue during cluster failover.
Jane Holly
The police had obtained thecourt order from the KL Magistrate’s Court at the last minute, that was in the judge’s own words, issued as “immediate action”.
As a result, Volume 2 of Kimi ni Todoke: From Me to You deserves a place among your collection, romance-comedy fans, and for many reasons too. It certainly won’t change the way we look at this genre but there’s much to say about a series that puts characters and story first and adds plenty of humor to its sweet romantic theme. If the first volume didn’t convince you this is a great series then this one will certainly do the trick.
Books are gorgeous when they're new. Often, when I'm in a store, I make sure I don't pick the copy furthest to the front, in order to get one in the best condition. However, if books are to be read, we must accept that pages may be creased and spines will wrinkle. Sticky fingers may find their way onto pristine pages. My original copy of 'Howl's Moving Castle' had to be thrown out when it fell apart. It was a sad moment when I binned those pages.
Lunar bats and orchid rodents
Soon pen, pencil and paper will also be against her!
We had planned to moor at the Fish and Ell GOBA moorings but as there were cattle running free the ground wasn’t in the best of condition we decided to push on a bit, the next two GOBA moorings the banks were a bit rough, OK for us but Magic can’t jump now so we have to have somewhere where its easy for him just to step off so we continued on to Holywell where there is a public mooring in front of the pub, unfortunately the Narrowboat we have seen 4 times this week was moored there,but he told us he was leaving when his wife returned so we dropped back and moored on the last GOBA mooring. About 5 pm. the Narrowboat left Holywell so moved up there, but as you can see from how we are moored there is a distinct lack of water, but what a lovely sky to end the day with.
In most of the debates that I have seen online and in live audiences either the woman stops being a feminist (out of protectiveness for the male child) or makes the life of the male child worse, by being extra strict.
Let's go all Natural. Yep, I would like you to use all natural colors this week, can't wait to see what you create.
That night you drove back, I had been sitting at the market for hours, waiting for you to get home, and secretly hoping you’d want to see me. Turns out you didn’t just want to see me, you needed to see me. You said physically, but you know I don’t separate the two, and I needed to see you mentally. And when I saw you, and I wrapped my arms around you, I don’t know if you remember this or not, but I actually started to shake. I tried to stop it, but I couldn’t. You asked me what was wrong, and all I could squeak out was, ” I’m just glad you’re home.”
So as I start to eke out a halfway decent "side hustle" in copywriting, I want to send my thanks to the lady and gentlemen whose teachings I hope make me the best copy cat in town. The poetry instructors who spent their valuable time reading my amateurish verse and squeezing out just enough redemption to give me the confidence to continue. I’m talking about Laura “La Bandita” Bandy, “Mad” Mike Madonick, and Steven “Wholesale Rearrangement of Flesh” Davenport. One could think that this post defiled your life’s work more than it honored it. But understand that I honestly believe the one thing all good Mad Men (and Mad Men Wannabes) have in common is the tiny inkling of poetry held in their hearts.
Let me be clear at the outset: nothing justifies an open toilet. It is an affront to human dignity. But that is precisely why this saga, as it has been told and re-told over the past six months, makes so little sense. There are too many contradictions and unanswered questions. And too few facts.
Real Ale Firemans #4- this beer rocks out of the firkin.
I’m not one of those writers who hates reality TV for taking away my jobs. I’m one of those humans who hates reality TV for slowly chipping away at the moral fortitude of our society. Not to be dramatic, or anything.
Last weekend was another therapy session. This time we were in the new office. It was nice to have a change in scenery.
Perfume or Body Splash?
- The number of employees hired during the quarter, attrition data, new clients added during a particular quarter, project scrapped, layoff etc.
Kis-My-Ft2 to release Tokyo Dome concert on DVD Ono Erena reveals jacket covers for her solo debut single “Erepyon” Girls’ Generation member Seohyun to attend UN’s ‘EXPO 2012 Yeosu Korea’ as a Goodwill Ambassador Super Junior wins in three categories for the Singapore’s ‘e-Awards’ Girls’ Generation, TVXQ, Super Junior, B2ST, and more to perform at Google headquarters AKB48’s Sashihara Rino visits Oita City for inauguration ceremony as sightseeing ambassador Taetiseo’s ‘Twinkle’ charts on Billboard 200
She jabbed him once again in the neck.
Curry powder, 2 tablespoons, make into paste
2. Like Young (3:31)
The rest I suppose is history. Long may the Azul family grow and the adventure continue.
Its no surprise given the proximity of the brake ducts to the exhaust outlets, that the lower stack of brake duct aerofoils are heat protected. No doubt some of the exhausts energy is used to drive airflow under the ducts to create more downforce.
Turn the dough out on to a lightly floured surface. Shape into a rectangle and cut into 12 pieces.
Because my mother locked me out all day. Then retired to the only air-conditioned room in the house: her bedroom. And that was that.
Now the much older me sometimes wonders how would it feel to read those diaries. I don’t have that option. Like a limb, they are cut off and disposed of.
I know that was a knee slapper, so one more to bring you over the edge...
Sometimes ghost stories happen in broad daylight. Apparitions appear in sunshine, their edges ruffled by a cold wind that springs from nowhere, on a city street.
I suppose you could follow my example, and set yourself up in similar fashion, but you’re probably already too late to make any sort of comprehensive preparation worthwhile. My zombie-proof shelter has been years in the making, requiring uncounted man-hours an untold amounts of money to fit out. Do you have the kind of time and resources needed for such an effort? Somehow I doubt it.
We thought we had had our fair share of challenges, but the week before our wedding, I had gone to the doctor for my pre-marital checkup, and he found a lump on my thyroid. He told us not to worry too much, but 6 months later when it was checked again, we were devastated to learn that I had papillary carcinoma, a form of thyroid cancer. Even the word “cancer” struck fear in our hearts, and I didn’t want to go through what I had seen my husband endure. Luckily, this kind wasn’t too aggressive, and after surgery to remove half my thyroid, the tests showed it had not spread, and I was given a clean bill of health.
Although technical details regarding the engine package are not yet known, the origins of the powerplant are believed to be of SuperGT derivation and, with the team having reportedly completed successful tests with an interim package in both Portimao and Barcelona, development is already well underway.
・ High-quality machined aluminum parts, including the lens barrel, hood and cap
Our agents have experience as author consultants for major publishing and promotional companies. We know the path to take to promote and sell an authors work. We have connections in the film industry, publishing companies, and multi-media marketing companies, Our agents are well traveled and have attended many book shows and Hollywood pitch fests in the past. We are a growing company and take pride in promoting works of every genre.
Yow MD, Demmler GJ. Congenital cytomegalovirus disease: 20 years is long enough. N Engl J Med 1992; 326: 702-703.
Some actually argue that whites are not entitled to such protection because “whites have power”. This echoes that deeply evil and unpleasant old bigot Jo Brand's claim that you can't be racist against whites for the same reason. These claims completely ignore the fact that in numerical terms both in America and in Britain there are more deprived white people living beneath the poverty line than all other racial groups .
I believe:-))
so in our beef sector. ”
-Specially designed protein-based blends provide your plants with
your steel-tipped boots,
God grant that we you left behind, shall bear your sacrifice in mind.
10. Favorite flower? Roses, sunflowers, orchids (purple ones!)
So, when I suggest you take inspiration from the next thing he postie delivers to your door ... I'm serious. It really can work! Especially if it has yellow and pink postage labels ... oh my ...
“One of my husband’s friends is over a lot. Girlfriend’s name is Patti. That sounds just like her. They can’t keep their hands off each other. They’re not very shy of personal displays of affection. And I hate going to the beach with them.”
A newly published study finds people are more likely to be inspired by abstract paintings after going through a frightening experience. In the words of researchers, Eskine, Kacinik and Prinz,“Fear is an emotional mechanism that increases survival chances by motivating fight, flight, or freezing responses to threatening situations. Fear seizes one’s attention, halts current plans, and increases vigilance. The capacity of a work of art to grab our interest and attention, to remove us from daily life, may stem from its ability to trigger our evolved mechanisms for coping with danger."
make sure you are listening young man for i will be testing you later
mine on the moon
In Wleklinski v. Targus (December 18, 2007, nonprecedential), the Federal Circuit held that there was no infringement under the doctrine of equivalents for a single unitary piece of inherently stretchable fabric where the claim requiring "auxiliary strap means" (left) with end sections (22, 24) "made of a relatively non-stretchable material" and the center section (20) "made of material which is longitudinally stretchable."
The biggest shock, however, comes from the demographics section. Apparently I have the viewing habits of a young woman rather than a middle-aged man.
But it's dark, filthy, disaster diner.
I can't escape the culture. None of us can.
The product is made with organic, natural ingredients that I can understand in a facility that runs on Solar power from renewable resources.
At Punggol Beach, there is shelter underneath the Viewing Gallery at the Jetty, bus stop, toilet, a small shelter (usually used by anglers) somewhere in the middle distance between Punggol Jetty and the Marina Country Club and then there is the Marina Country Club.
Did you share your knowledge with others?
There is more than pizza at Pizza Fusion. They offer salads, sandwiches, and desserts too. For the purpose of my review, I'll stick to what I ate; pizza and dessert. In terms of vegan pizza options, you can do one of two things; go with the "Very Vegan" pizza (mushrooms, roasted garlic, tomato sauce, soy cheese) or do a "Build Your Own". You also get to choose your crust, either traditional white or multigrain. I went with the Very Vegan on multigrain, in the personal size (you can also do large and extra large if you have a few people eating the same thing). Overall, this was a tasty pizza. The crust was thinner than I expected, which is a good thing since I like crispy pizza. The sauce was very good and well seasoned and the soy cheese (they use Follow Your Heart) melted well and tasted good. My main gripe is that they were pretty skimpy on the toppings. I could have definitely used a little more roasted garlic, since I only tasted it in maybe 2 or 3 bites of the whole pizza. Another quibble is the price. My personal pizza was $9. That seemed a bit steep for a pizza this size. Overall though, the pizza was tasty and satisfying. When it comes to dessert, the menu is limited, and the only vegan option (which also happens to be gluten-free) is a brownie. I felt like having dessert, so I ordered one to go. I have to say I was pretty disappointed. The brownie looked and smelled really appetizing, but it just fell short in the flavor and texture departments. The brownie was too cakey and almost fluffy, which was weird. It also had a sort of chalky aftertaste/texture which wasn't too pleasant. Too round it out, it just didn't taste that good.
Lights
Of places
And you help somebody every chance you get
glad the first week is over with.
Author and Professor Neil Baldwin
Low bullshit tolerance. Has no interest in your opinions especially if they are depreciating in any way.
During my first visit we were able to speak to one of the ALBA farmers, who also continues to work in the fields. The farm that he works for is a conventional farm that has a section dedicated to organic. It was when he moved from working in the conventional fields to the organic area that he started to get interested in ALBA.
Myth #7 – Introverts are weird
Director : Mike Leigh
-You can't split checks. Well you can, but you have to tell them when you sit down. The waiters still get annoyed and act like you're asking the most ridiculous request ever. Don't even think about individual checks.
Roller skates with pink wheels and laces – My best friend in grade school and I used to create entire dance routines on our skates. I broke my arm racing her in them. It was hard to pry them off my feet for dinner.
They answer, "Who is God that He should hear us,
After dinner we all went to the local athletics club who are holding 5km runs over summer on a Wednesday night. Steve Monaghetti was there to do a clinic and to run. He's 50 this year. We are all getting old. My brother who isn't at his fittest at the moment decided on the spur of the moment to run with my friend and I. It nearly killed him, but he dug deep and we crossed the finish line together. I really enjoyed the run and the endorphins. My mood feels elevated and I feel centred and calm dealing with the intensity of the kids emotions. Or maybe it's because Mr J is home and I am getting more sleep...
According to the Van Eck Market Vectors web site, VNM’s annual expense ratio is 0.99% due to a cap on expenses. After it expires on May 1, 2010, however, the expense ratio may be 1.4%… exactly like a mutual fund.
Let us call this the modern paradigm of truth. It is the dominant paradigm in developed societies.
I’ve received tons of letters from people asking advice about the entertainment industry and, in particular, pursing a life as an actor.People have also asked how I got to be on The Office.This blog, I hope, will address some of those questions.
to celebrate each other milestones....
Run your long runs fast
On April 26th, the ‘Yahoo! Celeb Mission Interview with Kim Hyun Joong’ was held, and 5 fans were selected from Hong Kong and Korea to ask him questions they’ve been wanting to ask. Even when fans asked silly questions such as which era would he like to visit if he could hop into a time machine, Kim Hyun Joong was not caught off-guard and maintained a fun atmosphere on set.
I've liked everything I've had from this brewery, so I hope this hasn't been sitting in the cellar too long. From what I remember, I got it in Nebraska about a year ago.
A Swedish diplomat’s recently deciphered perspective on the Unlawful
own "twinerific" fun soon!! And Lesley....thanks again for letting me
The IPKat notes with awe that the Court of Appeal went all the way back to 1970, to the Report of the Committee to Examine the Patent System and Patent Law (1970 Cmnd 4407, the Bank Report) -- which led to the 1977 Act -- when deciding what was the mischief at which section 68 was directed. That report indicated that section 33(3) should be purposively construed. The moral of this story is, never throw away your old law reform reports: you never know when they might come in handy. The Report stated (with the IPKat's emphasis):
One grassroot leader Bao Heng posted a lengthy comment on PM Lee’s Facebook today urging him to tackle the ‘foreign talent’ issue urgently and feel the real resentment of Singaporeans on the ground.
Rank = Level (class)
Focussing on the “Why” (as this is the cornerstone of great businesses and the other questions are ‘operational / management issues’ and therefore not necessarily concerned with the act of leadership):
You have never acted phony.
My husband was sweet enough to help me one night with dinner and it was the night that we had beef and broccoli on the menu. It. Was. Amazing. We received another head of broccoli in our Bountiful Basket yesterday, and if you haven't already guessed it...yes, this delicious meal has landed on our menu again for this upcoming week. This was my first attempt at making a beef and broccoli stir fry, like the kind we love to inhale at our favorite little Chinese restaurant, and I have to say I lucked out when I came across this recipe from Rainy Day Gal. Not only does it taste like it came straight out your favorite take out box, it is even a little better. I hope you enjoy it as much as we did!
P.S. – your quote of the year:
If you’re looking for value, keep a few things in mind: up and coming destinations, remote locations, and season. The right blend of these strategies will get you a great rental for an irresistible price.
7. Divorce Me C.O.D.
1 aptitude
At the Informal Education conference we’d attended in May, we’d expressed interest in being involved in the setting up of a federation of informal educators that would include home educators, and some months later were approached to help do just that. It took quite a bit of back and forth and organisation before the first meeting was set up, but we eventually got together up in Darlington with some great people from the world of informal education. We had a riot of a time (of course we were also terribly productive!) and in an email to the lady who took this photo I said “I can’t believe you managed to get a photo of us where we weren’t falling about laughing”. It was very hard to be in a room with Denise and not laugh. (I hope R & M don't object to me putting this photo up)
So this new job will be physically easier. But I am scared of high school kids. I remember high school. I was not a good kid. I just pray that doesn’t come back to bite me in the ass! I am truly excited though. It’s a job that if and when I do become pregnant again I won’t have to worry about losing it or taking time off. I’m ready for the change. I’m ready for new. I think it will help me get through this bump in my life. Nothing good comes from sitting at home moping all day. I’m not much of a moper though. I just get pissed off and use the word fuck a lot! lol.
In the Tower of Song
Magic Neighbor (2009)
They know the grief of man, but not the wisdom;
In her drive to be the most she could be despite her disadvantages, Chelsi had become a symbol of strength for the community of people in that room. Her presence at the gym had motivated them to greater achievements for themselves. On that day in the gym, they returned the favor.
1 T sage, finely chopped
Want to win a prize pack like the one pictured at the top of this post? You have the chance to win one full sized healing lotion and one travel sized healing lotion, one full sized healing cream and one travel sized healing cream.
130. Dio predebut
After the subject of ritters had been thoroughly exhausted we moved on to next week's Lichterfest, the children make lanterns from highly flammable paper & glue, put a lighted candle inside (most of the classes use small battery powered lights but Herr B poo poos such modern thinking) the classes then march through the woods behind the school together while the parents stay at the school and drink glühwein (I knew there was a reason for going) then the children come back, we stand around a bonfire in the playground while the children sing songs before everyone goes off to their respective classrooms for a small performance and food.
I have talked about this many times on Life Full Circle Radio. There are a ton of us 35+ that need to be “reprogrammed.” As a child growing up in the 80s, it was common for young boys to call each other “gay”, “faggot”, “homo”, etc as a means of insulting our friends and enemies. Of course it was “cool.” Our uncles, dads, grandpas and, dare I say, mommas used those terms all the time to either demean us or motivate us to act. One of the most motivating insults to get a kid to fight a kid picking on them, was to call them a gay slur if they didn’t stand up for themselves.
It was the hardest thing to do
It is what it is because of my dear friends and readers. I work 40+ hours a week, I have a toddler, and I have a disease I wouldn't wish on my worst enemy, so I am always wishing for more time to blog. But more importantly, and I know yall can relate, I wish for more time to create. That's why we're all blogging in the first place, isn't it? To have an outlet for sharing and receiving encouragement. In the short time I've been at this, you guys have been so supportive, and I want to thank you. So thank you :)
1/3 teaspoon salt
On stolen time(?)
I was greatly looking forward to the last issue of this series. Unfortunately, for whatever reason DDP has yet to release the third and final issue that was promised to us approximately THREE years ago. Although the issue has almost surely been completed, all that has been released to the public is the cover art.
I’ll just be Jules, Vincent — no more, no less.
The second card I used a different border punch, ink, chalk and both Easter 2010 and Twinkle Toes Cricut Cartridges for the cuts.
Saul spent three days in prayer, continually seeking Spiritual understanding. God answered that prayer. How eager are you to have similar Spiritual understanding? Prepare yourself with prayer and seek the fulfillment of Ephesians 3:4.
Food only, then split into 5/11 and 6/11,with the wine being added to the 5/11 and all other drinks added to the 6/11.Then (wonders never cease)a tip of 10% added to each.
Here is what you can win. This lovely PENDANT WATCH, I bought one and love it so much I knew I had to give one of them to the winner of my ANNIVERSARY GIVEAWAY. These cute BEE EARRINGS and this adorable FRIENDSHIP NECKLACE because I consider all of my followers my friends. I will be adding a couple more goodies before the GIVEAWAY ends.
Later that night when Johnny returned to his apartment, the door was unlocked. Darlene was the only other person with a key, so he hoped that she had changed her mind about the abortion and was waiting for him inside. When he opened his door and walked through the small apartment, he found that she wasn't there. Neither was the new stereo he had lined up for sale the following day. He rushed to his room and opened the drawer where she knew he kept his cash. The $400 he had left there was gone. So was his .38.
Eh, screw 'em if they want to stick their head in the sand. Let the nation pass them by and let them be pushed further to the margins. I'll welcome them back if they open their eyes, but in the meantime, I'm going to push hard for the north half of the state to break away and become South Iowa.
18th of April 2012
Hey Sweeties, how are you guys doing? :)
Queen Kat Designs (http://www.katstamps.com/) announces its latest search for loyal, dedicated and excited Royal Court members! You must be a STAMPER and card maker to apply. We are a stamp manufacturer that makes laser etched rubber stamps. We are looking for people who LOVE to stamp and can do so on a deadline with a smile!
Lives got changed for the better, always as a team....this is what this quote reminds me of each time I read it or remember it....I love my life, where today as an artist and facilitator, I can work with like minded individuals, who lead by example, teach and share our gifts without holding ownership to it and see that we are all teachers and students...it reminds me to keep fresh thinking alive, have a beginner's mind always, to honour and cherish the spirit in all of us, with love and kindness, I am reminded that we all have a lot to share and teach each other....
I’m not one of those “underemployed” recent college grads that I keep reading about.
The Search for Santa Paws ... Disney (west) ... 11 PM
The hat came from my happy hunting ground of Chesterfield flea market. One of these days, I'll take some photos and show you the delights of the market, it's great. There are an increasing number of vintage stalls, some of which have prices out of my league, but I have got to know a few stall holders and they cut me a reasonable deal as a regular customer.
The Civilians presents the world premiere of In the Footprint, a new play with music at the Irondale Center in Fort Greene. The site of the future Atlantic Yards Project, including the Barclays basketball arena, is located two blocks away from the theater where In the Footprint chronicles the conflicts surrounding the largest land development project in Brooklyn's history. This lively theatrical production is inspired by interviews with the real-life players in the controversy, representing many different perspectives: Daniel Goldstein, residents of Prospect Heights and Fort Greene, political leaders such as Letitia James and Marty Markowitz, members of Develop Don't Destroy Brooklyn, union members, and project supporters such as ACORN's Bertha Lewis.
It's December and Christmas is seriously right around the corner. I swear it was just Halloween, when I was struggling to make a few of the projects on my ever increasing to do, make, bake, create and gotta try list.
tiny blah blah blah...
For we know we need each other,
In today’s schools it seems physical education is getting cut from the budget anyway, but I do think it’s a good idea to incorporate Zumba to get the kids moving (they’ll think they are dancing). I would have done Zumba over square dancing any day (although it was an opportunity to touch cute boys who never talked to you under normal circumstances).
Although I got the lowdown on the beer from Matt Swihart at Belmont Station--he was there handing out cherries from his orchard--he actually blogged about the brewing process on Friday.
5. “How are we today?” (Sick people aren't mentally diminished infants)
Shaquille O’Neal has quite a celebration for his 34th birthday; he decided to go with a great victory for his team
"OK."
“On no account make a distinction between the absolute and the sentient world. Whatever consciousness Is, so also are phenomena” - (Huang Po)
I was reading on a crafty blog where they made a wreath like this. I plan on putting it out in March (My bday), July (Brents), and September (for Aidens). I am all about creating traditions for Aiden to remember his childhood by (especially at Christmas!). This was super fun, pretty fast (we were done by 2 and I had a 3 year old helper)
And now I'm teetering on the threshold of showing my new little blog to the world and I find myself consumed with anxiety and uncertainty and ... oh my god, will they like me?
Liber Tertius:
Know there is no honor in clingling to a goal that no longer inspires you.
And speaking of insulin, as you might remember, I’m on Lantus, which they give to humans. But this stuff is expensive, especially since Mom’s insurance doesn’t cover me (racist bastards), and is supposed to expire in 28 days from first usage. If you look at the bottle, I’ve barely used a quarter of it. So Mom spoke to the pharmacist at Target and she told Mom that, if it’s refrigerated, the Lantus should last a year. That’s great news! But Mom’s had it out the last 2 weeks to try to make things easier (so she doesn’t have to wait for it to come to room temperature – don’t want to shoot up the kitty with cold insulin). The pharmacist said that as long as it hadn’t been out for 28 days (it hadn’t), just stick it in the fridge and it will be fine. Rockin! I know that Mom’s been concerned about having to re-up my prescription every month – that’s over $1000 in insulin in a year if that’s the case! So this was good information to have.
Apparently, the previous owners, tired of the squeaking stairs, had removed the drywall so they could pound in a few shims in an attempt to quiet things. And, they never put it back. When I moved in, I immediately covered the hole with a piece of white paper, something like the shot below. Except, the wall was white and I used a staple gun.
Then the crowd chanting ” BUKA!BUKA!” but the officer do nothing.
2. I love chocolate, but that might not be interesting because who doesn't love chocolate
She's going to have one nice, round, hip-hop baby's momma booty, that's what!
Whisk all the dressing ingredients in large bowl.
Not moving her head or her eyes, she loosened her pajama bottoms allowing them to fall and lie bunched at her feet.
When lying, cheating and conscious ineptitude become standard “governance” practice (whatever the “sector”), we are in deep crisis.
In 2000, when I was launching Armadillo magazine, Ann Jungman published her first four titles as Barn Owl Books. Both initiatives grew out of the writers' and artists' support group, Northern Lights, which we had founded together in 1995. We had our meetings mostly at illustrator Jane Ray's house because her husband is a conductor and finding babysitters was sometimes difficult.
I did understand but somewhat devastated by that news..how about all my lovely blog followers expecting to see everything! I consoled myself by taking quite a few outside shots..
Elusive Love by Catherine Lanigan
What strikes me is that while their root actually means “hard” (as in the opposite of soft) or “difficult”, there is also an overriding optimism in most of these words, a theme of lasting, of coming through.
Thirdly, after surviving the said Puppy Invasion (yes, they all went to good homes and FAST - HALLELUJAH!) we put hardwoods down throughout our home....phew. Then I had another weak moment and let my husband REDO our entire kitchen. New Cabinets, Counters, Floors, everything. We are waiting on the final shipment of flooring to come in so it will match the rest but it is alllllllllmost done. And I l.o.v.e. it. I love it enough to almost want to start cooking in it. Disclaimer: almost.
And now I am not only a sushi convert, but also a sushi maker. Yes, it’s true that training to become a sushi master can take decades of dedication, but I'll settle with knowing the basics and munching on my humble, imperfect rolls.
On the way down the stairs the barkeep happened to notice Ibis.
ISBN-10: 1572934883
I am praying that as you walk with Yeshua through His last hours on this earth in flesh that you ponder deeply the mystery of His blood, what is it that is so awesome and powerful about His blood, that brings us into a new marriage covenant with God. We are His bride, we are His bride this is an awesome thought. His blood protects us from death, such a solemn time this passing over, His blood smeared on our hearts is what protects us from death, do we own this as true? How do you remember this sacrifice? The Feast of Unleavened Bread is like a time of mourning, expectation and sanctification mixed into one, how did His disciples feel coming back to celebrate this feast even though their Master had just been hung on the cross? How do we feel now? And what about when the disciples heard the news of His resurrection, what went on in their hearts? Can we also share in the intensity of these emotions?
And yeah I know you really liked her and it just don’t seem fair
But weep to have, that which it fears to lose.
The years and lives of Demented Are Go and especially of band original and vocalist Sparky (Mark Phillips) have been turbulent and unsettling to say the least but throughout the band has fought back to rile up music and their fans with notable releases such as Kicked Out Of Hell of 1988 and Hellbilly Storm in 2005. Times have been rocky for Sparky and testing for a band that has seen many changes over the years but nothing could stop them for long. For all the great releases it can be said that the band has not always lived up to those early days even if they out shone most other pretenders throughout but with the new album they have once more taken their place at the head of the genre with a mighty declaration.
1 level cup, basmati rice or any long grained rice, soaked for at least 30 minutes in water
Y’all are probably already scarf tying pros and are not amazed by youtube videos of some cute girl tying a scarf around her neck in 25 different ways in only 4.5 minutes.
You scare me because you did not spend the formative years of youth growing up in America and culturally you are not an American.
1. Pink dress (Ciel, 2008)
Inspired by the rich colors of the rocks, earth, sea and natural vegetation of the Italian coast, these maestro eye shadow harmonies range from the classic armani matte shades of grey, black and navy to rich, iridescent hues of lilac and gold. The maestro eye shadow palettes are the first armani eye shadow palettes to be enriched with light Micro-fil™ silk powders that melt perfectly into the skin to layer transparent and iridescent effects.
Don't do this if you have a cold or something short term. If you have broken your leg, that gives you a few days but unless you are an armless person who types with your toes, it won't stop you finishing the book after that.
Such is Life I guess.
Peter Purves continues to give a really excellent performance, especially as the First Doctor, and the partnership with Allen works extremely well, especially in the scene in which the big secret is revealed – it would be too big a spoiler to give it away, though a bit of knowledge about British law, and how it changed in 1967, is probably fairly useful to our understanding. It’s not exactly an earth-shattering secret, but works fairly well though I’m glad they didn;t make listeners wait until the next play!
Lulu was stamped on Neenah cardstock with Memento Ink and coloured with Copics. Her dress and hat were paper pieced with the Cosmo Cricket papers. Shading was added with Copics. Her boa was covered in Polar White Flower Soft and then sprinkled with Glamour Dust. I had originally coloured the pearl necklace with my Copics, but then thought it would be fun to give her some "real" pearls with a Viva Decor Pearl Pen. However, I should have made the pearls a little larger than the ones drawn on the image as my pearls all ended up running into each other and lost their definition. I think making each pearl a little larger would have helped to maintain the "pearl" shape better. Oh well...lesson learned. :)
* To make my home a haven for my family
you; He will never leave you nor forsake you. If He delivered you in the past,
November 6 Norfolk, VA Norva Theater
We were all so tired when we got back home and after we had some lunch we watched Transformers and then had a nap in the arvo…! That is probably why I’m still awake… (it’s 12.42am…). Time for bed now but I leave you with a bunch of photos from today’s event! Nite nite zzz
So many feelings in this Life
Nailed to your typewriter, never one to care
In his typed notes to his editors in New York, Vandivert described in detail what he saw. For example, of the sixth slide in this gallery, he
That being said, I did have a few plans for my characters – but some of them are already giving me the ol’ “fuck you!” and doing something completely different. I’d had a little bit of romance planned for much later in the series I’m working on for the main character with someone who hasn’t been introduced yet, however, the chemistry between them and another character is growing with every little word I write. I don’t really mind it – it just shocks me how letting my inspiration guide me and my characters do whatever is working so far! All I did was add a little bit of dialogue to reference to the internet phenomenon most of us have probably participated in at least once before, shipping, a tiny little joke that I intended to go no where, and within a few lines, my exact thoughts were, as follows:
This trio of ideas is like the Platonic values in Greek philosophy, which tell us that love, truth, order, and reason shape human existence from a higher reality. The difference is that even more ancient philosophies, with roots going back five thousand years, tell us that higher reality is with us right here and now. Its researchers were brilliant—the very Einsteins of consciousness. Anyone can reproduce and verify their results, as with the principles of science. More important, the future that spirituality promises—one of wisdom, freedom, and fulfillment—hasn’t vanished as the age of faith declined. Reality is reality. There is only one, and it’s permanent. This means that at some point the inner and outer worlds must meet; we won’t have to choose between them. That in itself will be a revolutionary discovery, since the dispute between science and religion has persuaded almost everyone that either you face reality and deal with the tough questions of everyday life (science), or you passively retreat and contemplate a realm beyond everyday life (religion).
to love the name of the LORD,
1. Harry Potter series by JK Rowling - HP is amazing, I can't even explain it in such a way that will make sense. Simply put, if you haven't started these books, you should check them out. They only get better as they go on!
Wish me luck and pray for me (:
How does street fishing differ from simple fishing though? In many ways, there is no difference, with the fundamental aspects of fishing remain the same no matter what environment. The techniques necessary for the activity are important skills for people to learn at any age, but perhaps particularly the young. Pierron lists observation, self-control and humility as being especially important as well as an awareness of your surroundings and learning the basic gestures of the discipline. It can give individuals a real sense of achievement too. As Pierron explains, “it’s the same as life as a whole – there is good luck and bad luck, but success or failure in fishing are dependant on the choices we make. You need to have a basic understanding of nature and fish, and what we manage to catch is the concretisation of what we have learned and understood”. It also gives people an insight into what is happening underneath a dark surface, and shows that nature does indeed exist in the city environment.
Where to find Nosferatu:
Tortious claims: In Malaysia, the Government is not above the law. Subject to some exceptions, a civil servant can sue the Government for damages in torts if the Government or a public authority has caused him loss.
I've had a few different people ask about my Dangle My Heart bracelet, which sold last week. They were wondering if I was going to make anymore, and one person asked about buying several of them. I wanted to order all the materials for that particular buyer. Unfortunately I searched around and one of the key components to that bracelet would take about 3 weeks to get here, and the buyer needed them sooner than that. (Rats!) I looked around for all sorts of similar alternatives, but no luck.
Ladybug got all the attention from Daddy that she wanted. She was pretty happy to sit back aways from the group and just watch. It didn't hurt that Daddy was sharing his Sprite with her.
Every main political party in Britain subscribes to the same discredited belief that the insane levels of immigration we have seen are somehow good for the country, not one of them, Labour, Tory or Lib Dem, will do a thing to change the current reality. no matter how mad it becomes. And the same applies to UKIP, they are a single issue, anti-European pressure group, who's policies might effect the number of white, Christian Europeans coming to Britain, however, as far non-European immigration is concerned, UKIP are in bed with the Lib/Lab/Con troika. In any event, a single issue pressure group like UKIP is not going to solve the multiple issue problems we face, particularly one which refuses to acknowledge the main problem.
Kegged: 11-03-2006 (w/ 2 oz. Saaz leaf)
And while Laurie hopes to one day eat her chickens (yeah I know, I just prefer mine sanitized and made unrecognizable by my local grocery store), she is still and will forever be a good egg.
A tax deductible contribution of only $10.00 provides an America's Hero with a Thanks-A-Bunch™ (TAB) card that can be redeemed for $50.00 at any one of more than 18,000 participating restaurants nationwide. That's five times the value of your contribution.
Of course, my connecting bus home was over twenty minutes late. I was tempted to call the station and ask if yet another bus ran out of gas.
"What do you want them to say?" he would ask.
In a kadai heat oil,then add onion slices ,curry leaves and saute till light golden brown.
Science - Colony 5
Fact Four: All students of a similar age learn the same way and at the same pace.
The copyright date is later than you might expect--1986, and I suspect the publishers were milking the franchise for all they could get by then. It's obvious that they simply clipped frames from shows that aired and pasted them in the book. The photos are all black and white and amazingly (I stopped myself from writing incredibly) blurry.
2. My Friends
to share
Some of the 500,000 early births in the United States each year can be explained by the increase in the number of women who opt to have children later in life or undergo fertility treatments — problems of a well-educated, health-care-rich country. Planned Caesarean sections also contribute to the numbers here, as do high rates of obesity.
Facts of the Case
wait for it...
So here’s to another awesome year, and I hope and pray that it will stay awesome. I pray the same for all my friends and family wherever they may be. May the good Lord preserve us and grant us a long and fruitful life.
The noises and mock tremors above let her know that it is now 05:50. The gurgling pipes reveal that Sarah is already in the shower. The blaring music reveals that Beth is ignoring her alarm, again. Soon the two will be yelling at each other, in a sisterly way, over whose turn it is in the bathroom. She returns to the kitchen, preparing a new pot of coffee for Jack and setting out the juice, milk, muesli and Pop-Tarts for the girls. Backpacks and jackets are by the door; lunch sacks will be ready by the time the girls venture down. A bowl of fruit sitting on the counter leaves the option and responsibility to them. The girls arrive quietly and respectfully begin their breakfasts. Sarah’s eyes are aglow; today is a field trip with her class. Beth’s face is pinched with concern; today is a test with her class. Jack walks in with bed head hair and scruffy face. He kisses his girls on the cheek, making them squeal and withdraw in mock horror. He joins his family at the table with his hot coffee in one hand and the other hand finding the nape of his wife’s neck for a quick caress when he passes behind her chair. He sits down in his chair and slides the cup aside. All hands appear on the table. Respectfully the eight hands are clasped together and the four heads are bowed in dignity. Sentence prayers are spoken by all.
Why do they know how to use it?
Another netizen added:
The concept of making public data freely accessible to all is allowing businesses in major North American cities to monitor arrival and departure times for customers using the latest GPS technology.
I really wish I had brought my camera to school on my birthday. My darling (and very sneaky) 6th graders found out it was my birthday, and they threw me my first ever surprise party! They all hid under their desks after we came back from lunch, and they jumped out and yelled "SURPRISE!" They even brought cake and presents!! My favorite part was the sweetest handmade card they presented to me after the party. It started out as just one folded piece of paper, but more kids wanted to sign it so they stapled more paper onto the back. The notes my students wrote me almost made me cry! They were all so sweet.
to take photos revealing
So, since I have been talking about addictions lately I thought I would talk about my addiction to coffee, but not just coffee, but to the variations of creamer that are available to go into my coffee…..enter stage left…
Good job! You’re ready!
a huge succes, everyone or almost everyone agreed with the new version.
The woman then met someone at a convenience store who offered her a place to stay and crack cocaine, which the woman had not used in the past. After spending several days using the drug, the woman met Wilson, who offered her a place to stay and more crack cocaine, Herrin said.
Richard K. Fraser, 32, New York, N.Y.
let me breathe the sound of your love
1 Corinthians 1:30 God has united you with Christ Jesus. For our benefit God made him to be wisdom itself. Christ made us right with God; he made us pure and holy, and he freed us from sin.
The best relationship is not the one that brings together perfect people; when each individual learns to live with the imperfections of others, they can admire the other person's good qualities.
9/11 – Cambridge, MA – Middle East Downstairs
But despite all that, there's no doubt that - of all the Avengers - Captain America and Hawkeye are probably the best friends. Cap, Thor, and Iron Man are all close, no doubt, but it's the kind of closeness built by respected professionals after years of working on an intimate basis. They still all have their separate lives and adventures - it's hard to imagine them relaxing together in the same way that some of the more tertiary Avengers do. Brian Michael Bendis - of all people! - captured this dynamic quite well in the Avengers: Prime mini-series. When they're fighting side-by-side, they are close as any three people can be - but when the fighting stops and they have to interact as people, their speech can be a bit stilted, their small talk tentative. They're not quite sure how to shoot the shit with each other. But you get the idea that, all things being equal, Hawkeye is one of Cap's closest real friends - right next to the Falcon, Sharon Carter, and Nick Fury (although, maybe not Fury for a few years since Fury's been written as such a doggedly unlikeable character), and probably more so than even Bucky (whose relationship with Cap is even more complicated and ambivalent than Hawkeye's). They've got more in common than just about anyone else - two senior Avengers who rely on little more than skills and their wit to allow them to hold their own next to the most powerful beings on the planet.
That leads to a second point. Whether it’s Davis’s earlier “10-to-1″ spread, the more recently reported “20-to-1,” or something in between, the income gap within equity partnerships has exploded throughout big law. That’s destabilizing.
It’s time for the president to obey the Constitution and put the American people’s national interest first.
So I looked at the characteristics of each of the four dichotomies that made up my score and decided which ones HONESTLY suited me best. And I actually came to same conclusion. Compared to the opposite description of each dichotomy, I would honestly say that my score is the best fit.
1. What shall we do with cultural messages that tell us we need to “earn our food” through extreme exercise in order to have permission to eat? According to Maslow it’s not earned but a right as humans.
well that's it, that's all you need to do
Now if you've read my criticism before, you probably know what's coming. When I start off praising, there is usually a catch, and about that, you are quite right. With all that I've said about Golia, all my expectations for him and all my faith in his abilities, I absolutely must call out and describe my disappointment with his Gagosian Beverly Hills show, a presentation that is smart, perhaps even slightly above average, but in the end the type of safe, innocuous, and forgettable work that we usually get from artists not named Golia.
Lots going on in our part of the blogosphere...
I naturally agree with him as regards the criminal behaviour of
and quicker quaked the questor’s quill
People Serving People Rooftop Garden
So, yes, there are all of these attempts by the state to demobilize us, to create fear. So what we do is actually practice what happens if a police officer knocks on your door or what happens in the process if police try to pen you in, and how to create solidarity with one another, which is really what this movement is about. And something Chris said earlier, you know, talking about revolution or what kind of process we’re on, and Marx talked about revolution as a train, and then Walter Benjamin talked about actually perhaps it’s not a train, perhaps it’s actually the moment when everybody on the train pulls the emergency brake. And I think that’s what we see with our movement. And that’s what May Day is about, is about pulling that brake, saying “Stop,” and opening up new spaces where we can create the alternatives, supporting one another in solidarity without that kind of fear.
TILDA HOLDING A FLOWER/BUNCH OF FLOWERS
it has confirmed
Reading this declaration, the beginning of a critical, theoretical design book (a rarity amongst the pared-back descriptions of colour theory and typography), brought back a flood of memories from my first effort at design school, a time of reading dystopian zines and anarchic cookbooks and Adbusters, of sitting in the library reading Marx and critiques of consumerism. This was the first time I made a hard left: On being told by my lecturers that I was destined for advertising, I signed up for a degree in philosophy.
I do not believe that happened in 2003, and the result was a decision to cut probation and treatment funding which led to immediate, explosive growth in the prison population and the prison budget. Fortunately for taxpayers, that vicious cycle was halted by reforms in 2007, followed by restored and expanded treatment alternatives in 2009. Public safety did not deteriorate in the least with the implementation of these sensible reforms.
Once again I have to start a post with a ginormous thank you.
Distance means nothing to me
It also showed the valiant efforts of some local residents in protesting against the slave trade, and this was initially the reason why some upper class women stopped taking sugar in their tea!
Something struck a chord in Paul’s mind. Her brain had exploded? That was the exact word the article had used. So why would this story be sent to his mind?
NBC, the FBI, the DOJ, ATF, the New York Post, CNN all of them attacked a character they assumed him to be with labels such as "Rambo" or "a white guy with aggression issues", generally an all around failure in life. They wanted him painted in a certain light to the public and they got it. The citizenry marched on him, called in death threats against him and, crucified him day in and day out.... all without trial. Perhaps the quote that surmised his fate was best said by the evening news anchor
The rotting, stinking, evil mass I will be sending them, seems a fitting reflection of their black hearts. Maybe, just maybe it will convince them that forcing people to work who are clearly incapable of doing so is murderous.
Throughout the whole film made me feel the most shocking thing that is “God is killed By God”. Even god will die . From this such inconceivable thing we can know how bold is the director!
The friend sitting next to me at the pub tensed up as the first words were heard, but before I could turn to him to comment on what I took for shared delight, he mumbled: “I hate that guy.” Like that, matter-of-factly. The Earth is round, water freezes at 0º C, and he hates Julio Iglesias. I had to ask him why, and he told me why: “He’s all over the place. And I don’t understand a word he’s saying!”
Maybe it is grandpa's teaching that is at the root of Kiwi and Ava's frustration with their father for his persistence in playing Indian.
2.Each combination must contain the same coloured atoms.
Jim starts this chapter with "Yoda", his secret Chinese army intelligence benefactor, telling Jim he had arranged a trip for him to learn an important lesson. "Dr. Garrow," explained Yoda's two associates, "we are going to show you something which may shock you, but it will give you an understanding of what we Chinese think and where we come from.” Jim goes on to matter-of-factually state that "We headed for Yunnan province, about two hours from the city of Kunming." Jim presents this as a "day trip", which struck me as odd given that Kunming is over a thousand kilometers from Chongqing. Distance aside, Jim recounts how he was brought to a Buddhist temple outside Kunming, and given over to two monks who escorted Jim on a walk.
are not personified qualities, but incarnations or emanations of living and conscious Forces with whom we can enter into concrete touch and they take human bodies in order to help man and show him the way from his mortal state to a divine consciousness and immortal life. SRI AUROBINDO
Dani, your family is so strong , and I am so proud of the way they are able to celebrate your life. Your mom is truly one of the most amazing people I know, and those babies of yours are just beautiful. Your friends, always remembering the happy little Dani, that we all know and love. Your life is truly something to celebrate and so many people love you dearly. You touched so many hearts!!
Now they’ll dump me and she’ll invite him up. I blew it – and I really like him a lot. Oh screw it, I’m not gonna get all upset. I’ve got reading to do tonight. Maybe I’ll get into bed early. I’ll turn on a movie and take an extra Seconol.”Wiest’s facial expressions are perfectly in sync with her voice-over monologue. Her face adds to what’s said; her eyes aptly convey Holly’s agitated acquiescence. Undoubtedly it was moments like this that went toward her nabbing that first Oscar. Holly’s unlucky, can’t get the breaks, and Wiest ensures we give a shit every step of the way. Her impatient and jumpy neediness to be liked translates wonderfully.
A major question was “How did Japan destroy so many ships, airplanes and lives without anyone suspecting in advance the terrible attacks?” Mr. Shirley tells of every day lives, political and historical events, and world leaders’ actions.
Luke Kuechly possesses good but not great measurables for the position at 6-3 235 lbs. While his size is not ideal it is definitely not a huge concern as he shows a compact/nice build for the position in the NFL. Many are considering Kuechly to man the position of inside linebacker at the next level and while his body size might be more suited to an outside linebacker, I believe Kuechly’s most natural fit in the NFL will be at the Mike position. Kuechly looks capable of adding 5-10 lbs. of muscle to his frame. By showing up a few pounds heavier than his college playing weight Kuechly would help hinder some of the flack he has received about his size. Due to his current size limitations Kuechly would be best served to play behind a bigger defensive line and preferably in a 4-3 system where he can stay clean and be allowed to roam and flow to the football with a little more ease and comfortability.
On Christmas Eve, we begged to open presents. Mom said she hadn't had time to wrap them yet (as I think on this—I can't believe she had time to buy any). We said we didn't care so she brought them down still in their shopping bags. We laughed and talked as we opened the bags.
As well as setting the diary and Koichi’s trip into historical context, Stephen was also keen to find out what happened to Koichi after he returned to Japan and this is now included in the diary.
They were obtained from an auto supply store and I decided to select natural over synthetic material.
"UP WHERE WE BELONG" (AN OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN)
Maks and Melissa were not in the lineup at the end of the show. Melissa injured herself during the dance and as a precaution, was taken to the hospital. No word on what happened or how’s she’s doing until tomorrow night. Get well, Melissa!
04. Friday night at the drive in bingo
Now remember, TiVo was first introduced in 1998. While all the wailing and panic about DVRs has been going on, TV viewership has increased. As a matter of fact, according to Nielsen, TV viewership has increased 21% since 1998.
After transfering the entire mash to the cooler, things went pretty smooth until the end of the boil, when we found ourselves losing the siphon, losing flow through the heat exchanger! That was fixable by getting the pot higher and having someone stand up there stirring the kettle to free up any hops from the kettle screen, so it could run freely to the fermenter. This was somewhat exacerbated, I'm sure, by the incredibly viscous 1.117 O.G. wort.
Ugh, now dull Gwynney is singing, or she tries to. I'm not buying it. Ugly microphone (is it a Mr. Microphone?).
On April 11, the day after his “The Mission Matters Most!” address to the worldwide church, President Steve Veazey spoke at the Leaders Gathering in Independence, Missouri. He asked: “What does it mean to you?”
I or my site do not personally collect any personal information about your or your online activities.
SUBJECT: LIMPOPO PROVINCE SPLIT OVER ZUMA AND MBEKI
Compass’ operations are not simply limited to the provision of tasty and affordable meals; their ultimate goal is to meet the dietary requirements of their customers on a case-by-case basis. For example, their corporate based services are aimed at “refreshing tired minds and refueling the productivity of people at work” while their educational based services are aimed at “helping boost the concentration of young minds at school and college”. It is this unique emphasis on meeting the specific nutritional needs of their diverse customer base that has helped distinguish Compass from it closest competitors.
One of the thing's I'm learning while working at Starbucks is the idea of consistency. People like to know that, even if the rest of their life is chaotic, when they walk into Starbucks, they can order a grande triple vanilla soy latte and know exactly what it is that they're ordering and know that they'll enjoy it. People like that all the Starbucks venues basically look the same; they like that all the coffee's the same kind and that each drink follows a recipe. People like that the Starbucks employees are interchangeable.
you savor the scent of dying flesh,
Please, they plead, let’s go back to the pre-2010 system where foreign spouses of locals have to renew their visas every month for a year, then every year for about 10 years. And then they can apply for PR status.
Time is an unruly, unrelenting force you can’t beat. Time is all things, fast, medium slow, whatever it wants to be and we abide by it. I don’t need to go into great detail about every moment and every significant reason as to why time works the way it does, we just frigging know it kicks our ass.. We wait for time, time doesn’t wait for us. We try to hurry up time with our newest and latest technology break throughs. “Get the fastest way to do everything all day and all the time, be the first to know 20 seconds before someone else does!!”
For glaze:
Don't even get me started on the likes of Amazon ... just suffice it to say that yet again it will be "ordinary" drinkers in pubs up and down the land that will pay the price for HMRC's latest wheeze. Still, at least "we're all in this together"
As you can see, I didn't quite get the swirliness like in Martha's brownies below. Oh, and I didn't add the nuts. The brownies were a success! That very faint hint of spiciness paired well with the pumpkin flavor in these brownies. I think if I would have taken the time to layer the batter as suggested, there would be a better mixture of flavors when bitting into the brownie. With just the layer of pumpkin on top, it's more divided flavor/texture when you bite into the brownie, if that makes any sense. I would definitely make these again.
Yes it is going to be that kind of day. I am feeling contrary. I have no idea why. I had kind of a mixed bag sort of day yesterday. I had some good writing experiences and bad writing experiences. I made a little over a dollar for writing a television description, it took me less than 10 minutes to write and it boosted my overall ranking, and I wasn’t doing anything productive anyway, so why the hell not?
Love and blessing to all!
He survived the nuclear fallout in St. Petersburg and hid in the London Metrozone - the last city in England. He's lived this long because he's a man of rules and logic.
1/2 gallon of water
The pictures of the chaffinch are, I think, my favourites. They came out very clearly, and using manual focus as well although the bird was quite happy to sit and wait for me to find the right focal point so I’m not sure that I’d be quite so successful with moving creatures.
What's your favorite cocktail?
Why Would You Prefer Replica Watches?
SO... I have turned this Mashed Potato idea into Homemade Hash Browns.
“Innovative,” Emily murmured.
I also have a book I must start for book club. I have had the book lying on my coffee table for a couple of weeks, but haven't had the time to even crack it open...have no idea what it's about, so going to be surprised!! My mother has another doc's appointment this Monday and it's with the marathon wait doc, so maybe I'll be able to read it in it's entirety like I have other book club selections, unless some woman comes in with a screaming baby who likes throwing bottles at people...remember that blog???
For those of you who have submitted before, ever wonder how an agent can ask for the first 20 pages and still reject our book? Did you ever wonder if the agents really read these pages? How can they know our book isn’t something they want to represent with so little to go on?
Do You Want New Wave or Do You Want the Truth?
And tell the world you love him
When Ruby woke up on her tenth birthday, something about her had changed. Something frightening enough to make her parents lock her in the garage and call the police. Something that gets her sent to Thurmond, a brutal government “rehabilitation camp.” She might have survived the mysterious disease that’s killed most of America’s children, but she and the others have been cursed with something far worse: frightening abilities they cannot control.
Some departments that bring in invited speakers want not only a title but also an abstract, presumably to provide further information for those who are considering attending, or just for general educational purposes. I always comply, but I don't like providing talk abstracts because I feel that it limits what I talk about, more than just a title.
The EDL are nothing but a further front for Zionist intent pushing forward with their agenda regardless of the wishes of this countries host population, those who support and protest on behalf of the EDL do a disservice to our ancestors, to our nation and in the final analyse
Note, the blankets are very much in play here. In fact, you can clearly see Sassy's "kitty nest."
To solve the problem of the missing Assignments, new Assignments were made and recorded.
Combine the dry ingredients and wet ingredients together well. In your greased 9X5 bread loaf pan, pour in the batter, you will have enough batter for two loaves. Bake the bread for 50 minutes or until a toothpick inserted comes out clean. Then slice, eat and enjoy!
I cry out in despair
Germany has higher wages, higher taxes, higher welfare costs, a lower percentage of college and professional graduates, and lower spending as a percent of GDP on R&D than the United States. Yet, in contrast to America’s chronically large trade deficit and high unemployment rate, Germany has a huge trade surplus and a low unemployment rate. What’s going on?
Why we spent it on the beach of course!
Et voila! The lighting in the photos really doesn't do justice to the lovely shimmer and sheen of this card.
Private sources of money for the Institute of Medicine
We’ve been hearing about “globalization” in the last couple of decades, but I seldom feel it even though I have traveled to many places and been immersed in very diverse environments. To me this earthquake in Japan was one of the experiences where I felt being in touch with globalization. The news traveled all across the globe in an instance and many countries reacted to it by extending help. My heart is aching for the people who lost their families, homes and businesses in Japan. At the same time, it is heart warming to know that so many people in the world are praying for Japan to pull through this difficult time.
This time it is for a smaller group, 25-30 players as they watch game tape. It doesn’t have to be much, they say. I decided that I wanted to make beef stew.
If we advertise
We were on our way to a restaurant to get some food. There was this homeless (I thought) woman standing on the corner with the sign. While my mom read the sign I turned my head. Maybe I didn’t want to make eye contact with her. Only, God knows the truth.
“Men, Life, Love, growing up…it didn’t feel real. Life didn’t feel real. I wanted to tackle something. I had to go somewhere to find it. I wanted to live, challenge, wish, forget, learn, know, ask… See, stare, understand, hear, listen, speak, meet…and be there. I wanted to stand with my own heart. To walk with my own feet.” -Noriko
Sweater - thrifted - $2
faculty to access teaching and research materials more cost-effectively than if
Jane believed she could find and refine those virtues in Mr. Rochester. I believed the same thing about my husband. Doesn’t that break the old rule, though? “Don’t choose a man thinking you’re going to change him?” Maybe a bit. But it comes down to what the man actually wants. Mr. Rochester wanted to be a good man. My husband wanted to be a good man. And the Rake always gets what he wants.
“No but-“
Here's how it's done:
The kids were riding bikes without helmets and I made her come home for hers. The risk of a head injury from biking, while still tiny, is much larger than the risk of being abducted off the street.
“That was it!” Today, Fox & Friends co-anchor Gretchen Carlson explained her current disdain for a good cold brew. After a segment tease that beer made men smarter than their sober friends, Gretchen declared, “The worst part of that study is that I’m going to have to start liking beer.”*
Stealing time. That is what it has felt like of late. Like I have had to steal time... time to sleep. time to eat regular meals. time to spend with my family. time to be with my husband. And in those instances, I was never far away from being plagued by a sense of guilt. Like I was not allowed to have that time. In my head, there lurked an evil voice that kept whispering to me "you should be sitting at that computer, editing away, replying every email, and looking at all those photos!" and it would come again, and again, and again. I would see families hanging out in parks, laughing and enjoying life together when I would be working, and tiny seeds of envy would grow.
A short hike down the cliff is our favorite beach (so far) for shells. This beach is called Survivor Beach! I think it is because you are thankful you survived the hike down the cliff. Of course, there is always the hike back up! We have found some amazing shells here. On one trip Sammy, Bethany and I were playing in a tide pool and there were so many shells. What was even more amazing was that they were all perfect. It was like someone came and just dropped them all there for us to find. We were quickly filling our bags and within minutes we started becoming a little more particular about what we actually put in our bag. As we were searching we were talking about how shocked the others would be when they saw all we had found.
Leader of the Labour group, Craig Martin, said:
One environment in which fossils are preserved is amber. Resin emerging from trees flow over a living thing, preserving it in its exact original state, and such fossils trapped in amber point to a very important fact, as do all other fossils: Living things have remained unchanged for millions of years—in other words, they never underwent evolution.
150gr honey
In The New Testament pastors and their sheep crop up many times. They are singled out as amongst the first to be told about The Incarnation. Christ later in his preaching himself sets them up as exemplars, ideals to be imitated and followed.
October is my favorite month in my favorite season. I met Tom in October and we got married on that same date 4 years later. We rescued Benny (and he rescued us) in October. Halloween is my favorite holiday. The leaves are changing to beautiful colors of greens, oranges, reds and browns. The weather is cool and crisp and winter is still a while away. Sweaters and jackets come out of the closet and it's the perfect time for cooking warm, comforting food like soups and stews.
9If any man have an ear, let him hear.
Elizabeth Peters is both a distinguished academic and a prize-winning author. She has won the Agatha Award for best mystery novel, the Mystery Writers of America’s Grand Master Award, and the Malice Domestic Lifetime Achievement Award. Peters’s expertise in Egyptian subjects (she has a PhD in Egyptology from the University of Chicago’s Oriental Institute) provides the scholarly underpinning for these meticulously researched archeological mysteries.
6. You've turned DC around very quickly. How much of the next two books was decided at the point of your publishing deal? Did you have a trilogy in mind at the beginning or was this something that you developed with the publisher?
Amidst all of the other documentary / found footage / lo-fi SHIT being made, an occasional gem emerges. Such is the case, according to most, with the Spanish film “REC”. There has since been a sequel, as well as an American copy, which, from what I know, is basically the same movie, just made by Americans and about a year later. Lovelock has already given me a hard time about the fact that there will be subtitles at play here, but I think he’ll get over it once he starts getting the shit scared out of him.
I couldn't let such a beautiful day off of work go to waste so it was time to hit the range. I put 50 rounds through the little Nagant Pistol and about 200 with one of my AR's. This one being my first and still my favorite AR it is just a DPMS classic 16 heavy barrel but it shoots straight with some good groupings at 100 yards.
So last week I briefly mentioned that I believe that there is a six pack of craft beer marketing success. I chose six because I know that all beery folk think of things in 6 pack units. See already I’m targeting my message to my audience, that’s number one. Well actually it’s not number one, but you should know that all good marketing starts with an understanding of your audience, the best advice I could give anyone when selling anything, ‘Know your audience.’
Oh, mercy mercy me,
Another special memory I have of Miss King is that she took me to the ballet at Her Majesty’s Theatre when I was still quite young, perhaps 10 to 12 years old. I think it was Swan Lake that we saw but I’m not certain, I just remember the beauty of the costumes and the dance. No doubt I was on my absolutely best behaviour.
A young bus passenger peeks over her seat at me and Abby, the two foreigners, the only women not covering their faces with niqab, the face veil.
He was openly rude to Israeli Prime Minister Netanyahu and snubbed our British cousins in a variety of ways that did not go unnoticed. It’s hard to find a foreign leader that does not consider him to be an idiot even if they won’t go on record to say it.
I can't wait to walk lighter, love deeper, and have more freedom, this year in his RESTORATION and LOVE!
Profession: Restaurant Manager/ Wine Sommelier
For additional information, contact:
Now, I haven't packed, looked out the stuff I need to pack, found my passport or changed my money yet so what I'm doing online is beyond me.
A meter is equal to 39.37 inches so 7 meters would equal 275.59 inches or almost 23 feet. There goes most of Florida not to mention sea coast cities and communities around the globe.
Buster Friendly is played by an actor (always while actually doing the show in studio with a camera). The fact that he kills her while on TV is made a big deal... Deckard is turned into a villian of sorts (a minor subplot) after killing everyone's favorite singer.
I read the paragraphs where David Finch, who is absolutely hilarious and brilliant, writes about his habit of fetching his clean clothes from the dryer while leaving the rest of the clothes there. Because he didn't need them. They weren't his clothes.
Offence, after all, is a two way street. A cis-sexual white male can be genuinely offended by a gay person picking him up on his thoughtlessly heteronormative way of expressing himself. If offending someone were the criterion for being objectionable, then the “political correctness” of the gay person is equally objectionable.
There are many neat touches in this story, but overall I didn't think it was a story of quite the same quality as Carr's best work. In particular, the murder motive, and the link between one of the victims and the killer, are not, in my opinion, really clued in a fair enough way. (Of course, this means I didn't figure out the solution! But when a mystery is fairly clued, my inability to solve it makes me admire the author's skill - that's why I admire Christie so much.)
In the coming season simplicity will lead to the profound. Refuse to allow complications to take you off course. Your task is to eliminate distractions in order to gain spiritual depth. That will mean a shift in focus from satisfying fleshly desire to developing a spiritual desire to be one with Me, says the Lord. This shift in desire will require discipline and self-control, but the outcome will be worth your effort. For, you will certainly see the manifestation of My glory as you continue to seek first the kingdom of God.
Files submitted to Eprint should be in Word, Quark or PDF format. Ideally, if submitting PDF files, they should be in the final trim dimensions of the printed book. Eprint can provide a unique full colour cover if the author has not provided one. Eprint can also provide an author with ISBN allocation, legal deposit, full internal layout, royalty payments, online listing and online database listing, as well as a choice of several bindings;
"So ano? Gusto mo ba?" Gino asked me. I was jolted back from my reverie.
B. northern Unionists
Don’t Let Teens Be Scapegoats for Primghar Bullying
Surkin – Gold Island – (Bok Bok & L-vis 1990 Remix)
For me, it’s obvious; I don’t have much time for romances. I don’t like the obvious formulas, the shuddering caresses and trembling limbs…pu-lease! No disrespect to the authors who do this, but I’ve never been able to elicit such reactions from the ladies (I was more often the “Special Friend.” Ladies, do us a favor and retire this term), so it all seems pretty far-fetched to me. Give me a space ship or a magic ring any day.
Where have all the conservatives gone?
Another had promise
6. Your favorite band/singers? The Clash, Radiohead, Led Zepplin, NY Dolls, T Rex, AC/DC, Bob Dylan, Joni Mitchell, U2, Metallica, David Bowie, and many many others.
It shouldn't be allowed.
Through shadowed eyes. My smile flickers as you
I have stopped along the way to smell the views.
Avoid an unexpected wake-up call by checking on your progress more often than not… And when better than around New Year’s? Be open to new ideas or even complete revisions – goals should be tailored to fit your lifestyle which is apt to change on a regular basis. Once you get the hang of checking in regularly, the fun really begins… With two of you, you have an advantage against most by doubling your efforts to save time and money – who’d have thought that!?
I’m skankin, on the dance floor, I’m drunk off that Hennessey
I have other sheep that do not belong to this fold. These also I must lead, and they will hear my voice, and there will be one flock, one shepherd.
There is a curious lack of practical knowledge or interest. Indicators are presented as “a good idea”, but not as an on-going practice. The organization that asks academic libraries to use performance indicators avoid them in its own practice. In its annual reports on statistics from academic and special libraries, ABM restricted itself to variables (absolute frequencies). Statistics Norway, in charge of all official statistics, does the same. Not an indicator in sight.
For Julianna C. stopping by last night.. and showing us a few things with Grandma.
“Come on Bitch, make me cum!” She began to move Olivia’s head up and down by tugging at her hair. Her movements became more and more violent with every thrust.
a greater emphasis on the lyrics. In most respects, it was
INMA will integrate social media feedback into the World Congress programming, notably on Twitter using the #inmawc hashtag. This will create an “echo chamber” for the INMA World Congress.
Grey Sommers, Lord Wyndham, never met a predicament he couldn’t charm his way out of. Then a tryst with a government official’s wife during a bit of casual espionage in France condemns him to a decade in a dungeon, leaving him a shadow of his former self. Yet his greatest challenge may be the enigmatic spy sent to free his body – the only woman who might heal his soul.
**Notice how I don't jump to the conclusion that white cops are protecting a 'white' man for killing a black kid?
Hey there, Internet Audience. As regular readers (all two of you) may remember, a while ago we began sending out queries to agents for the first time. It did not go well. And to all the other aspiring writers out there who will probably have to go through the same experience we did, I'd like to take a moment to talk about what that actually felt like.
Unfortunately, Sewing Summit 2012 registration is already sold out! But there is a wait list, in case more tickets become available later. Click here for more information.
With a brewhouse that once produced beers for the now-defunct Cedar Creek brewpub in Egg Harbor City, Great Blue had planned to target its beers made with its own Jersey-grown hops for markets near the farm, a take on the concept of farm to fork, in this case, farm to glass.
This summer, I have really gotten into using lean meats. Not just ground turkey, but lean ground turkey...and lean ground beef too. Not only is it healthier, but it tastes better too! You wouldn't believe the difference in taste and the amount of fat the drips off these things.
7:27
On a related note - I got a new water bottle and I really love it. You know how you keep trying to find one you like and they don't really work - but then you find THE ONE? I think I found my one. I already broke the clip off, Of course, but that's fine. I really like it. It's metal and purple and has a whimsical feather design and it has a straw that is squishy so I can chew on it, but not destroy it. And, I'm drinking more water because of it. Which is why I'm eating mixed nuts anyway - they make me thirsty.
Mammút - Svefnsykt
No one from the police has yet apologised for their actions.
There’s been only one visible Fast and Furious resignation: U.S. Attorney Dennis Burke in Phoenix, who quietly stepped down on Tuesday. One of his last acts? Opposing the request of murdered Border Patrol Agent Brian Terry’s family to qualify as crime victims in a court case against the thug who bought the Fast and Furious guns used in Terry’s murder.
A violent but interesting read about a man who comes across some money from a drug deal gone bad, and then has to hide from the sociopath who's looking for it. McCarthy has a bare-bones style, which makes reading his books a tad confusing when he does things like not using punctuation marks, but his choice of words and the storyline will keep you intrigued regardless.
It's morning of Day 3 of quieting the input.
The lovely Sara at CRAFTERS COMPANION has given me the chance to let one of my lovely blogging friends win the brand new Spectrum Noir DVD which is to be launched on Create and Craft tonight at 9pm. Not only that but it will also signed by both Sara and Leann themselves . I am so pleased to be able to give away my first blog candy, so all you have to do is leave your name and link your blog, facebook or twitter page using the link below and one name will be selected at random after 9pm tomorrow night thats Wednesday 15th February.
Anytime a loved one passes away, it’s only natural to reflect on what really matters in this life. We were continually blessed by our relationship with Christ and by our relationship with family. Those two things are always worth the investment.
What is your most prized possession?
I had the most amazing Middle Eastern Inspired Vegetarian Platter with lemony lentils, eggplant, curried spinach, Turkish yogurt, and couscous. Every bite was flavorful and interesting. I would go there just for a repeat of this dish!
"OH.....MY GAWDDDDDD....FANTASTIC!"
I only have a few boxes left and hadn't found my set of big rusty vintage keys....
It's a cute story and makes for a great lesson - be content and happy where you are in life. A great lesson for younger ones - enjoy being a child or a teen - responsibilities will come soon enough.
Ensemble message: When I received this cardigan for Christmas, I immediately wanted to pair it with all things olive! I started with my favorite olive pants, so I decided to wear it with my favorite olive dress next. I really like how the raspberry color brightens up an otherwise neutral outfit. Also, I’m loving the preppy nature of the overall look (belt, boots), but that the color of the cardigan gives it a twist!
From October 7, 2011:
We’ve been lucky enough to play some shows with King Creosote in the past, and I’ve bumped into Johnny Lynch who’s the Pictish Trail who runs FENCE with Kenny (Anderson of King Creosote) and they’ve had us up to Homegame and stuff. That was a big thing for us as King Creosote, especially, has always been a massive influence on our music from the early days. The fact that you can play some shows with these folk makes you feel like you’re a part of it anyway.
Kedi is a... spirit who currently happens to be in cat form. Only those with whom he is in direct contact realise that he's more than just an ordinary cat - currently he lets his guard down only around Austin, the English boy he's befriended in my middle grade novel The Face of A Lion.
Goodness... that bouquet was beautiful. I had a mix of white peony, white ranunculus and white roses. I truly adored this bouquet. There were also small touches of white feathers at the base to give it a soft edge....
video synopsis on adult romance by: Eric S.
I long to puncture the fake boobs like over inflated tires, hear the hiss of escaping air, and bring them back to normalcy. Women's breasts are not watermelons. We are not Pamela Anderson. We are not centerfolds.
Healy TEJ, Poole TR, Hopper A. Rat fetal development and maternal exposure toTrichloroethylene 100 p.p.m. Br J Anaesth 1982; 54: 337-341.
The Doctor’s monologue focuses on this connection between Fenric and Ace. Fenric threatens to kill Ace if the Doctor doesn’t kneel before Zod, and the Doctor simply tells him to kill her. He tells Fenric that he’s known about the evil within Ace all along. Why else, he demands to know, would he take a social misfit and emotional cripple along with him on his journeys? As Ace begins to look horrified, the Doctor condemns her by pointing out the disconnect between her intelligence and what she’s been able to accomplish: she couldn’t even pass chemistry, the Doctor seethes, but was able to create a time storm in her bedroom? The Doctor tells Fenric he knew of his involvement once he saw the chess set in Lady Pienforte’s study back in SILVER NEMESIS, and that he’s just been using Ace to get Fenric to come to him.
Never before have we been so close in contact with the world, and yet still alone. The Internet and telephone have others at our finger tips. I love modern technology. How I can blog, email and be in contact with so many others. It can be a farce though. Others giving of themselves only what they want them to know. We can be anyone we want. Any kind of mother we want.
and I converted the Bliss stamp into a wedding themed one.
An entertainment insider tells Nikkan Sports that Tanaka was a member of the modeling section at an agency. “Because she wasn’t so tall, jobs were scarce,” the source says. “So once she joined Tokyo Performance Doll, she stopped work at the agency. She did some work on television variety shows. Rumors also were going around about various relationships with men.”
Some of his fondest memories were of sailing the Caribbean, sitting on the beach in Cabo San Lucas, hunting dove and deer with "the boys," traveling Rocketman-style through the Northwest Territories, enjoying the Southwest (especially Canyon De Chelly and the Navajo culture), and gathering with the family for Memorial Day in Grand Coulee, Columbus Day in Long Beach, and above all, the 4th of July on Priest Point. Tom was always happiest at home on his own deck, and never more so than when surrounded by his family. He loved crabbing and clamming with his girls, whose earliest memories include fun times on Papa's boat. His warmth, humor, and gusto della vita made every holiday, birthday party, weekend barbecue, and drop-in visit special. He was our pirate, our Batman, our Christmas Eve Santa Claus, and our go-to guy. We have lost our Papa and our hearts are broken, but we'll carry him with us always. We'll smile when we think of him, when we eat pesto and blackberry pie, and when we remind each other, always, "Alla famiglia."
of sense –
Q: Are you going to make Very Serious Children (one of my novels) a series?
It is rmended that before move at any paper spirited in a cards or an online cards that you follow a few guardianship to ply adjudicate the skills of the other players.
budhā bhāva-samanvitāḥ
Later this semester, Fischer plans to move the journal online for a fall issue that includes the visual arts like art, music and video as well. The spring issue will continue to run in its print format.
Happiness fills my heart.
I would like to think that each of us has some awareness of God’s sustaining power. Whether it is our next breath or the touch of a gentle breeze, God provides all that we need. To be certain that we understand the workings of God’s nurturing ways, Jesus walked among us to explain this through his every word and deed. God’s Holy Spirit followed to seal the deal by demonstrating that God actually dwells within each of us. Our vine dresser not only provides for us, but also remains connected to us though Jesus and the Spirit. Our part in all of this is to mingle and to intertwine and to become woven together. As we bear fruit amd flourish together, we support one another and keep one another anchored safely to the Vine who sustains us all.
So it has been a while since my last post. The HD on the laptop ate it big time. It started making a couple errors so I figured I would back it up. Well it completly failed while backing up. Big time bummer, lost all my data. So I have been starting from scratch.
I want to personally thank EVERYONE that shared their pee story. It means a lot to know I'm not totally alone in this :)
They might be nice people but I definitely won't seat with them because I don't want them to see me puking right front of them.
And since we have no family around for exactly one bazillion miles.........we don't go out.
Remember these three bloggers host with me
So final grade: It’s worth a viewing at matinée price, but otherwise just wait for DVD. B-/C+
The most recent correction in small cap stocks (using Russell 200 ETF (IWM) as a proxy) started on 3/27/2012, is also not over yet.
Skirt, thrifted, ???; turtle neck, ???; sweater, hand-me-down; leggings, ???; shoes (not shown), Fly London
Something about the prospect of moving into a new house is making me want to have a bare minimum of stuff to go into it.
Graphic design continues to be a challenge for me, but I learn a little something every time I play. Artfire's new studio design forced me to play again since the banner size changed. I'm pretty satisfied with how it came out. It's very simple, but it works.
That’s right – the girl who is infamous for stripping online and going nude at the drop of a hat, will soon be making her B-town debut in the boldest-ever film made in India.
No soul
Maya is 16 and has never been kissed; Lochie is 17 and shy and intelligent. They have three younger siblings and a mother who is a drunk and neglects them half the time to hang out with her boyfriend. As a result, Maya and Lochie have become the father and mother of their family, supervising homework, doing the washing-up, desperately trying to keep Social Services at bay. Tabitha slowly builds up the tension until it becomes unbearable; you feel that Maya and Lochie cannot survive and will have to snap, one way or another. Thus, the ugly concept of incest is turned on its head, for when they begin to feel romantic feelings for each other, their relationship becomes redemptive, a salvation for both of them, a chance for them to retreat from the burden of being adults – ironically, a chance to become innocent again, carefree, teenagers in love.
Intercom: “Go right ahead…”
Jethro Bodine
-Open to a random page
How's it feel A!? How does it feel!
It’s time to see what that means.
- Walnut Stain Distress Ink
businessman Lim Siew Cheng $900,677 (S$1.2 million) for
One of the biggest CONS this country has ever seen, and they are getting away with it.
"The letters seemed untouched and were starting to yellow," Savage said. "I just had a bad feeling."
Since Eric mentioned to me a couple of weeks ago that he would like me to start contributing some articles to his blog, I have been debating about how to introduce myself to the EricCressey.com crowd and what his audience might want to hear.
Unconditional Election:
I also won a few wonderful giveaways this month. Deborah O'Hare has a wonderful blog, actually two and I have been following her for over a year, her pieces inspire me to create my own art pieces. I won the book, Seaside Home, and I love it. It has a lot of patterns to make things for the home, or summer cottage.
On his chest
According to Witnesses, scores of villagers scavenging for fuel were killed in the air strike.
STEP 1: Trace your headboard pattern onto your piece, or pieces, of MDF. To help make sure each side of your headboard is the same, you can use a large piece of paper or cardboard that has only half the pattern on it and then flip it to get an exact match.
Here it is, the "Name Up To Three" meme. I don't think anyone reads my blog that doesn't read hers, but consider yourself challenged, if you have not been already.
Colonel Yates strides into the hall with several men. One of them Lucy recognizes as one of the men who subdued Hibbs; in a flash she realizes that the other man who grappled with her sweetheart was the man who so resembles her father. Who are all these people? And who is Colonel Yates?
Rod: 3.8 (Who also noted: "You guys are jerks. If this was aged, (my score) would be even higher)
Row 23-28- continue decreasing 1sc per stitch series until you have (sc in 1, sc dec) (12)
I love the British spelling of foetus because it has foe in it.
A few days after that first appointment, I left the country to go on vacation, careful not to do anything that may further aggravate my neck (as much as I tried, I couldn’t help but go surfing, boogie-boarding, kayaking and swimming…careless, yes, but being out of a stressful work environment in a warm climate worked wonders!), even though I was already feeling much better. Shortly after returning from vacation, I visited an acupuncturist/RMT who came highly recommended from my chiropractor. When I visited my chiropractor again a few days after having acupuncture, he was amazed at how my condition had improved and proceeded to do another session of ART and prescribe a new set of exercises to help speed along my recovery.
I have discovered that God is the orchestrator of our lives… He conducts and directs–if we will let Him! I laughingly commented to my husband, “Since God has been working so many things out lately, I’ve found I trust Him even more!” (Okay, not the most mature comment, seeing as the times I should trust Him the most is during the life events I don’t understand–but cut me some slack here as I’m having a ball!) Perhaps I will store up and treasure and remember these times for when life’s music begins playing the Blues.
Ok...so that last one is mine.... :-)
My part in upsetting her the day she whipped me causes me guilt even unto this moment. I was capable as the next child for causing conflict apparently and I can see the ‘real picture’ today from afar.
When I was a kid, a teen and through my first two years of college, if I wasn’t at church or a formal function, I was wearing sneakers or tennis shoes– whatever you like to call them.
The Z.E. has a 130mm stretch over the standard petrol-driven variant. As much as it seems on paper, it does take a keen eye to spot the differences. Despite having a longer boot, the Z.E. still suffers a cut in boot volume. This, however, contribute to the driving characteristics, all thanks to a considerably different weight distribution – which shall be discussed in the latter section.
As many of you may remember, I took a week of holidays in February, and stated that I’d be writing a symphony and a book that week. I did work on both, though I did not finish either. I learned in that week, that there is a very big difference between ‘a beginning’ and ‘the beginning’. I have hundreds of the former, and only one of the later. (As it should be?)
Farther and farther, all the birds
“All three of us took a shot at drums,” explains Lane, “but none of us could keep the timing. So I asked Natalie to jam with us once, and then decided she was in the band…she didn’t know that yet, but it worked out pretty well.”
Whiskers is grounded. Under house arrest. Inside from 5pm onward come hell or high water.
Ran/hiked from Chat to the base of the 2nd, scrambled the 2nd (to the walk-off) in 9:20, then continued on to the summit at a hard pace for a 39min ascent. Was feeling some good flow on the way down and made it back to Chat with a 23min descent by coming down the same way (but taking the trail down instead of downclimbing the 2nd). My altimeter shows this (and this morning's) run as 3100' efforts, but an even 3000' seems fair.
Use the tiny flower from Fruit and Flowers to start building up the flower. Use the stamp three or four times without re-inking to get a good range of colours. Keep adding layers of flowers working down the stems.
After hanging up,he looks at the hoarding in front of him advertising a hair care product promising the classic oxymoronic promise of delivering a “new and improved” version,unsure of what he was looking at or what was he asked to do.A minute later,he brushes the confusion away and starts walking to the butcher’s shop down the street.
How alone a new house will be. No nicks, no height markers. No memories. Everything will be in place. No dirty little hand prints. No damp towels on the floor. No laundry piled up in corners. All the things that drove me crazy...
1 diminutive
In this compelling and funny book, Frazer reveals his own thoughts and feelings when faced with stardom at an early age, the pressure of being an early 'media celebrity', his love of horses and cricket, and what it was actually like to date, marry and divorce some of the most eligible and beautiful women to have crossed stage and screen in the last 40 years.
It has been a long time since I last blogged...November to be exact. Ugh.
You makes goals , do this and that but..
“You’re hungry I bet.” Darien laughed, looking down on the sleepy princess in his arms. “Come on, let’s take you to the master and he’ll fix you right up.”
Two of those are regulated by governments, “leaving one of the primary culprits behind this worldwide health crisis unchecked,” the authors, Robert H. Lustig, Laura A. Schmidt and Claire D. Brindis, argued.
The Queen's speech is given at the start of each parliament. The Queen sets out what "her government" (not ours, notice) intends to do. The House of Commons (the elected chamber) is often seen on TV at times of national importance. Set piece debates, with hundreds of MPs roaring support behind either The Prime Minister or The Would Be Prime Minister.
On our last full day in Vegas we booked to go on a helicopter flight over the Grand Canyon, Hoover Dam and the strip. It almost didn't happen as Jonathan is scared of heights and has never been on a helicopter before but he overcame his fears and off we went!
My mind didn’t remember what it was like to be whole, so most of the time I didn’t long to be put back together again. If all one knows is a state of brokenness, then how can one long for something else. But my body remembered, so it longed for the too short time when it knew completeness. From a place deep inside the yearning was so intense that it translated into pain. The painful longing mixed with forgotten pain, and together they created an unrest so powerful that it can make a girl run for years and years, terrified of looking back. Running for reasons unknown, reasons that felt too threatening to stop and ask why she was running.
The question hung in the air between them.
This happened in a span of 8 hrs.
The hand of the Lord has done this. (Job 12:9)
You can do all this with the attitude that you are on their side. They want to be multicultural. You can wholeheartedly agree: Multiculturalism is great. Studying other cultures is illuminating. And then educate them on how some other cultures live today. Compare and contrast those cultures with the freedoms and equality we enjoy in this culture.
I've gone through a wide range of rucksack options over nearly two decades. I started with the ALICE large ruck and frame, as a young Ranger, moved on to a civilian mountaineering rucksack courtesy of Dana Designs, as a SF NCO, then tried a couple of different high-end military rucksack systems from the commercial market before reverting to the "big green tick" of my youth. The ALICE pack is not ideal for anyone, and is simply unbearable for most. I accept that reality, and seldom, if ever, recommend it, unless someone is on a budget (and often not even then. Kelty makes some extremely durable, large-capacity internal frame packs that are not much more expensive than a surplus ALICE ruck, while being far more comfortable for most people to carry). Nevertheless, my body long ago developed the necessary contortions to carry an extremely heavy ALICE ruck and still remain tolerably comfortable doing so (at least as "comfortable" as a "gut-check" can ever be). It works for ME.
We are becoming homeowners!
One said she fell asleep after being given alcohol, waking to heavy breathing on her neck as she realised she was being raped.
So the inducted Musical Maestros, in no particular order, are:
band unknown
Combine brownie mix, oil, water and eggs in large bowl; stir 50 strokes with spooon. Set aside.
Your professionalism reviews can help get you the gigs to showcase your musicality.
Let them cool down completely and keep in a tin. They will last in perfect condition for 2-3 weeks.
I thought this was a really clever idea, people could do something useful, but not actually have to DO a great deal, I mean you are shopping anyway, whats the hassle in throwing an extra can or jar in the trolley? Sometimes the best intentions get lost in the business of the season, so after my super chicken deal I figured I should add a few more items to my Mission basket, so along with Special K cereal I picked up a big jar of coffee and some Squiggle Tops, my personal fav choccie biscuit.
Chris in her dress, her sleeves rolled up, a vaguely dishevelled room and the simple act of caring for one’s child. It’s essentially what the film comes back to at the end for me and the reason I was so stressed when the film ended was not because I was petrified, but because a crying Ellen Burstyn makes me distraught. A mother’s devotion? Ellen sells it completely.
All is flux, nothing is stationary.
2. Last night, we toasted the arrival of fall weather — and the departure of summer's flavors — with the last summer cocktail. Usually, I enjoy Zen green tea liqueur simply over ice with a squeeze of lemon, but I saw an ad for it recently that included a simple cocktail ... which also matched the dregs in my bar last night: 2 parts Zen, 2 parts vodka, fresh orange juice. So long, summer.
The woman responded to Jesus by going straight into town and blabbing about all Jesus has said to everyone who would listen. What is alarming is that people actually did listen. And, not only did they listen . . . some of them believed Jesus because of her testimony. The people were so excited about what she had shared that they formed the first search committee to hunt down Jesus and invite him to stick around to tell them more.
Andrew and I are going to be "Danny and Sandy" for halloween! :)
My brain ceased to reel. I saw all.
Early day motion 1896: North London and Herts Newspaper Group
Stitching Real or Faux
Anyway, yesterday followed the usual running day routine-
But when he finally emerged from the jungle in 2005, he came carrying a little monkey on his back, Kiko. They were skinny and half dead, but they had made it through all these years.
Official figures show the number of European offenders sent to jail for violent or sexual offences has tripled in recent years.
Copyright 2010
The only way ANY woman can have a vbac is if she gives birth under her own power, in harmony with her body’s natural processes in birth. It’s not about place, or even care providers.
Sadly, I have to admit that arts programs are usually on the cutting block first. I say sadly because I am a beneficiary of arts in the schools. Particularly the performing arts.
Plenty of research has taken place over the years that says people don’t form relationships with brands, they form relationships with people. Social media accelerates the formation and depth of relationships by enabling quicker communication and sharing amongst their individual networks. If your employees are not allowed to use the social channels in their every day work then they are limiting their marketing effectiveness in this fast changing social world. So, what are you waiting for? Make a plan to pilot social media within your organisation. Enjoy and good luck!
Hope that helps put you on the right track to gar fishing. We put 5 gar in the boat between 3-5 ft within 1 1/2 Hr. The action can be much faster if you cast to the small males. We try to target the larger females that swim with them. If you have a good day, feel free to send pics to Dally’s Ozark Fly Fisher. Good luck & happy fishing.
After I’d managed to get this, which actually went surprisingly well, I started on the knitting. Now…to be honest again I could cope. But my first blanket square did have a couple of holes in it. Grrr. On occasions I could see that I was almost missing a stitch or going for the wrong one.
I had a Girls Day of Fun with my bestie Jessica! We got massages, ate yummy fajitas at Chuy's, went shopping, and got our nails done. It was sooo much fun and just what I needed! Oh and did I mention we got a disco nail?
@bschefke: Glenn Beck realizes that the Republican budget plan is actually a cookbook
has made a gorgeous selection of cards.
As it turns out, it only took 1 search with Google to find out he was actually putting the money where the settlement said it should go. ZeroHedge has a nice little breakdown of how the settlement money is divided.
At midnight on the river,
Can't they see her pain?
I do admit, however, that this is a two-way path for me. I have found that what I'm writing can influence my mood too. I've even ended up laughing as I wrote a scene, so hopefully I will be able to find a balance between my seasonal moods and what I write. Otherwise, I will have to write horror novels during the cold seasons and romantic fiction during the other half of the year.
but have observed and admired from afar.
One other thing…I have cracked the 230 pound barrier and the weigh in this morning was 229 pounds! Hopefully, this is the beginning of the weight loss portion of the adventure!
"The Legendary Pink Box" is a triple-disc set of rare and unreleased stuff (or so I presume: it comes with no information). And it's as far-fetched and bound-less
And ten thousand people-oids split into small tribes
Rates include flight and hotel taxes and fees. Car rental rates do not include taxes, airport fees, insurance, options, underage driver charges (if applicable) or fuel costs, all of which must be paid directly to the rental car company and are subject to change by each individual State and/or location.
I show you the ones I saw in Moscow.
and in the blue dusk the sea
I DO NOT WANT TO KNOW THAT!
The 'Three Heads In The Well' is another fairy-tale with mythic echoes. The well is under a great tree, and from the well's depths float up three wise heads, which speak to the heroine. In Norse Myth, there is a well between the roots of the great World Tree, and by the side of the well is the head of Mimir, which has wise words for those who question it. And Celtic Myth is full of magical, talking severed heads.
This coming weekend we're hosting the "Girls Day Out" at our house! :) Our theme it "Cinco De Mayo Gay Bingo" with gay really having nothing to do with it....LOL Our initial thought was to do Gay Bingo in Seattle but I just don't handle the "party" scene all that well....and decided it'd probably send me over the edge....... so we'd make our own "safe" gay bingo at home!! I think we're going to have a taco bar and some homemade tamales .... mmmm. We'll also do a little celebration of Ryan and her 30th birthday on the 24th! (you're getting old!!)
We got you some baby headphones (the sound reducer type) so we could take you to things like movies at your aunt's (she turns the sound WAY up) and fireworks, and your uncle decided you needed to accessorize them with sunglasses.
The professor plugged the electric cord of the big machine into the wall socket and snapped on a switch at the base of the aluminum casing. Instantly a brilliant red streamer flashed toward the ceiling, suffusing the room in a carmine glow. At the base of the machine a blinding bar of crystal light swayed drunkenly for a moment, then steadied to a rigid rod. It struck against a quartz plate and seemed to be disintegrated or absorbed thereby. The two students started back from this demon of light, half frightened by the crackle and roar of the thousands of sparks and streaks of miniature lightning crashing across the gap on the coils below the main part of the machine.
did you know that is one of walmart's $4 Perscriptions?
Hoppin' Frog Frog's Hollow Double Pumpkin Ale
"Also, even if the combat mission comes to an end by 2014, observers stress that some US military presence in Afghanistan is likely beyond that point -- similar to the situation in Iraq."
I'm not sure if many of you remember me discussing this new theme I wanted to run with about things I've tried and whether or not I liked them. One reader, a favorite of mine, aka Kallay over at kalllaydoscope was listening to me the day I vowed I had never tried a reuben sandwich. I believe this post caught her eye because like me, she had never tried one in her life either. I shouldn't have felt so alone in this, my husband had never tried them in his lifetime as well.
The announcement has been made during the third annual Universities Week campaign –starting today (Monday April 30)- which aims to increase public awareness of the wide and varied role of the UK’s universities. This year’s campaign will look at the contribution that our universities make – and have always made – to the Olympic movement, the sports industry and society as whole.
Exercise: I walked/jogged a mile at 11:00 pm. I just couldn’t go to sleep without doing it!
“I saw that after 54 years of independence, we have come to point zero again. We have become racial when we want to win votes.
Since worship is tied to religion and religious practice this all gets tossed about with the popular notion of being "spiritual" without being "religious." In other words, we can be "spiritual" without the trappings of "religion" and, lately, Jesus is "spiritual" but not "religious". There is a lot packed into why people may feel obligated to make this distinction. Certainly, faith is every day and not just attendance at worship. Yet there is also the consideration that if faith is every day then coming to God in worship is included in that daily faith. That is, faith does not pit worship against life or vice versa. Neither, it may be argued, would faith pit being spiritual and being religious against each other, or Jesus against religion.
On a very personal level, I regret the slow, steady demise of the print newspaper. For three decades, you see, I earned my daily bread in journalism, scribbling about sports for a variety of newspapers. To this day, I still pound out the odd article on a freelance basis and, although 13 years removed from the daily grind of meeting deadlines and the demands of demanding editors, I’d still get a kick out of seeing my byline in print. If I actually picked up a newspaper.
I am not going to make any absolute promises, and if I do attempt the craziness of POSTADAY2011, I will be sure to tag correctly so that you all can still find the zoo blogs with ease.
However, the satisfaction one feels as the lines on the paper begin to form the image one wishes to draw seems so much more personal than when drawing digitally. Similar to the difference between turning the pages of a book while curled up in an overstuffed easy chair and scrolling through a digital book.
Just as we are all settled in with our daughter, now we have decided to move (figures)! Thank goodness we're only moving to another house in our same town, though, only 4 miles away. The difference is we'll have a little over 2 and a half more times the space than our current house! I'm not joking; we're going from an 1,183 square foot house to one that's 3,078! One huge source of stress for all of us has been that we feel like we're constantly on top of each other. Very little personal space combined with two kids, one of whom is VERY loud and both of whom are VERY energetic, has turned me into a walking emotional disaster area. I love my kids to death, no question, but too much is too much! Since we homeschool, I'm pretty much with them 24/7, so you can imagine, and I'm sure many of you don't even have to imagine because you're in a similar situation. I'm so thankful we'll be outta here in two weeks and one day. Yes, I'm counting down :)
ROM 1:27 And likewise also the men, leaving the natural use of the woman, burned in their lust one toward another; men with men working that which is unseemly, and receiving in themselves that recompence of their error which was meet.
And you'll never change the system by bombing number ten
They keep offering me Peeps. I freaking love Peeps. They are my favorite food on the face of the earth. Do Peeps counts as food? I am trying really hard to be good today. Weight Watchers is going so well. I am down 39.2 pounds as of today (I took my weigh in a day early do to possible Easter debauchery) and I really don't want to screw it up. Hell, I even made WW's friendly coconut cupcakes that I found on Pinterest for dessert today. But I really want a Peep, or 2 or a whole package.
Happy Saturday! Today is Day Two of Teasers for Tuesday's release at My Favorite Things . The Creative Team is previewing these sets: Jolinne - Always Wear a Smile, Sew Nifty, and Claire Keay - Ahoy Matey.
Cause Marketing isn’t defined as the nonprofit and public organizations’ use of marketing techniques to impact societal behavior (e.g. stop smoking, don’t pollute, don’t use drugs), and it’s not “Corporate Philanthropy”, the giving (without expectation of direct corporate gain) of charity by companies or their corporate foundations. Rye, New York-based The Cause Marketing Forum defines Cause Marketing as follows:
On the men’s side of things its about the Aggies and Oklahoma hurdler Ronnie Ash. The Aggies are the defending national champion and like their female counterparts, the Aggie men are powered by their sprinters. Conference champions Gerald Phiri (100), Curtis Mitchell (200) and Tabarie Henry (400) are the core that ran the Aggie machine in this meet and will have to come through in Eugene if they hope to repeat. All three have a shot at taking the podium in their individual events. And judging from their conference runs Phiri and Mitchell have a shot at individual gold – especially Mitchell. But their road to another title could be fragile as they don’t have the overall depth that they had last year and that a few other teams have this year. In Missouri they finished third behind Nebraska and Oklahoma – two teams not anticipated to be in the overall title hunt in Eugene – and they finished behind Baylor in the 4x1. To repeat their big 3 and both relays will have to come through with big points, any falters and their chase for a title could be over early. A potentially tough chore with the Pac10, ACC and SEC all sending powerful sprint squads to Eugene.
Furthermore, Civil Service is divided into State and Local services. Local service includes counties, municipalities, and independent authorities and commissions.
Oh and BTW, I also have an announcement to make before I move onto my top reasons why I have been acting like such a jerk and not letting you guys know how my life is going. On my Youtube channel I am going to be posting more videos. What about may you ask. I am actually going to start with a series of Minecraft videos and then go on with a few more realistic (instead of gameplay videos) videos with spoofs of almost everything I can find funny. If you would like to check my channel, subscribe to it, by all means go ahead. If you do not know how to subscribe to a channel but yet you DO have a Youtube channel, then you may go on Youtube and look up how to do that. If you don’t know how to look up stuff on Youtube, then you DO have a problem.
Fortunately, I think that our lunch at Le Temps des Cerises, a co-operative restaurant run by a group of people who take turns doing different jobs, was a success. At least I didn't make the mistake of recommending the rognons de veau (calf kidneys) to Nancy. Watching the rain trickle down the windows and hoping for a respite from the torrential downpour, we gazed out the window like the two women in the above photo.
Kasempa was the first “town” we’d met in a while now so we hit the market to re-provision. We were approached by a strangely disproportioned little man with a rolling gait who began to beat us with his t-shirt, gurgling out a stream of incoherent Kiikaunda (the local language) and covering Murray in a light spray of phlegm. He then deposited his few belongings (2 water bottles and a stick) on Alex’s pannier bag, gum-full smile beaming. We graciously returned these and scampered away, heading for a recommended guest house. While unpacking our kit outside the room who should arrive but our friend from the market. Rattling on about something to do with relish, he removed all his clothes save his undies and sat down next to Murray’s bike, merrily sucking on a tijili (little sachets of 40% alcohol spirits) and throwing matches at us. His next sentence which caught our attention involved something like
Now that we have a bit of a background as to what development costs will look like next generation lets look at what developers currently make. To survive a developer needs to sell a million or more copies to break even. Even a low budget PS3 game often can cost over ten million.
Heavy load = no joy.
Carrot, 1 pc, cut into 1”x ¼” x ¼ “
Repeat with another chocolate layer, brushing the chocolate layer with the espresso mixture and adding the buttercream and then ending with an almond layer on top. Don't brush the almond layer or top it with buttercream. You will have one chocolate layer left. Chill the cake for 15 minutes to set the buttercream.
Mentally
Like all the designs in Tanya Whelan's book, I found this one really straightforward and fun to make. She suggests different ways of playing with each thing to get a different shape or style if you fancy which makes it even more addictive. Just Miss Rosey's skirt to finish and then I've a few more things to have a go at.
Australian academics' latent refusal to have their intellectual activity monitored by the new sector regulator, the Tertiary Education and Quality Standards Agency, breathed life into the idea of intellectual freedom. But it doesn't appear to have vivified the liberty of the press.
If you are on a quest for answers, this little statement will feel like a let down. In fact, on the face of it, it doesn’t seem like any answer at all.
Waters said he had been upset after his family had been made to sit at the bar in a busy restaurant in Camps Bay, Cape Town, for half an hour.
The Padres will be wearing 1978-style uniforms on May 18th. I wonder how those caps will end up.
I grew up surrounded by lots of granola/hippie homeschooling moms. ;-) Babywearing and breastfeeding (and co-sleeping) have always been what's *normal* to me, and I find myself surprised at how *abnormal* those things are to much of the population! So many people think breastfeeding is "gross", co-sleeping "dangerous", and so many people don't seem to even know about the existence of babywearing.
It was good to hear him defend a military presence in Afghanistan, which is something a sizeable number of Germans, with their knee-jerk anti-war attitudes, don't want to hear, but he was right: this is a golden chance, already mostly-blown by the US, to restore a country devastated by war to a functioning, and peaceful, state. It was good to hear him denounce nuclear weapons, not just in Iran (where they don't have them) but around the world. And it was really good to hear him emphasize that the US and Europe have to listen to each other, and to reject unilateralism: that part of the speech was for the Europeans.
It’s not rocket science.
How to clean a stainless steel funnel when you have no running hot water:
Veep isn’t a bad show. Not by any stretch. There is a lot to like about it. But I was kind of stunned when the end of the show came and I wasn’t bowled over. As I’ve written before, comedy pilots are especially difficult to do well and Veep may have suffered the burden of my too high expectations. I was so excited about the show that it was going to be difficult for it to live up the hype. I usually try to temper my anticipation, but this show seemed to be so in my wheelhouse that I failed to do that this time.
Listen to my interview with Cal Poly pitching coach Jason Kelly
baahon mein chupkar saanson se, jaise dole raat
Ansouis is very pretty town and there’s a charming place just down the street from the Mairie called La Closerie. Excellent food and very good value for money. 04-90-09-90-54.
My command from God
It was a privilege to speak with outstanding leaders whom I have respected and looked up to over many years. One was Mvume Dandala, past President of the MCSA and, until recently, parliamentary leader of the Congress of the People (Cope). Cope seems to lack the very moral and principled leadership the seminary wishes to inculcate, but Mvume said that he was concerned about how Christians tend to reject politics and refuse to get involved at that level. He said that it is precisely in the area of politics that we need the type of leaders the SMMS seeks to produce.
I am really trying to not get down but it is hard when there is always so much to do. It is overwhelming.
Now it might not have been such a surprise to most of you. To me, it really is. I never thought I would actually send in the tuition payment. I have wanted to do it for almost a year now, but just never had the guts to go through with it. Time is a thing that none of can ever recapture, and I didn't want to look back and ask myself, why I didn't do it.
ACK! My heart was screaming out to tell him 'too bad so sad' and know that he would be over it by morning, but my head had to butt in and remind me that although he is still little, he is trying to find his place in this world as a big boy. He is only 4 years old, but I think that is definitely old enough to be voicing his opinions and for me to hear them.
Bloomsbury are bringing out one a month, so you can follow the smelly witch's fortunes like a soap opera.
Whatever it is that’s weighing on your heart, do it, because this life is precious, and it is fleeting. Customize yours, and make it count.
A disquisition about abuse and demonization of those who do not follow the Progressive Script would not be complete without a place of honor for the Green Green Pods from Space and their invective spilled on global warming skeptics.
among the pine branches and the dew that the night drops before retiring…
This story definitely deserves a better reputation than it has so far received.
Suggestions for Prayer:
This is the title of a book that sounds really cool to me.
The letter, also signed by Miriam Margolyes, Richard Wilson and Jonathan Miller, said: "We ask the Globe to withdraw the invitation so that the festival is not complicit with human rights violations and the illegal colonisation of occupied land. By inviting Habima, the Globe is associating itself with policies of exclusion preached by the Israeli state and endorsed by its national theatre company."
they were hung very low!!
And let me know what you think about blog videos...more in the future or please don't ever record another one? :)
What, gentle reader, are we to make of these appalling revelations? Can it be that those we have loved and respected are mere mortals? Worse, flawed mortals. My worry is that, once the initial shock has worn off, it might leave me cynical; questioning of devolution, suspicious of politicians and political systems. I do hope not.
Usher does random hot stuff too..,like slo strip teases with his back to the audience; taking bling out of a mission impossible type brief case. He also has a gold platted mic in the shape of a gun..,hahaha. The RS guys will need to hit the gym this summer….there has to b @ least one number where they all rip their tops off…u think?
I am an idiot. See you tomorrow, Book Review Club. *slinks into corner, weeping.*
I heard once that the fact that color was introduced into film/photography actually distracts the viewer, and that black and white makes you focus on what is truly important and will give you more of an experience. I completely agree.
Yay! I’m already looking forward to tomorrow!
So here is the deal. Drop me a comment if you want me to start up again. Pass it on to your friends and readers and if I get 50 comments I'm in. I'll re-commit myself to the blog world.
Please join me to encourage and be encouraged! No particular post is required but maybe, if you have time, encourage another blogger on this link-up and maybe, you too will be encouraged!
Serve immediately.
organizing the garage
Imagine a large convention center filled with rows and rows of tables. Upon those tables are pitcher after pitcher of beers brewed from coast to coast. Upon entry you are given a tasting glass where you can taste as little or as many beers that you want. You get the idea...
For everyone, I hope, someone
Here is a blog post on Katz's tour by a supporter of the Green Party. It calls her a 'war resistor' and opens with the line:
Split seconds before release .... only a Now
I will sometimes divert from my destination to drive around in old neighborhoods with classic cracker houses looking for a salvage yard. I am on the look out for double loop fencing, a certain old timey Sears garden gate, metal bendy rocking chairs and the tacky metal door decorations that support a screen door; usually featuring herons and cat tails or possibly gators. If I had the means, I would purchase a cracker house and have it broken down, shipped up to Georgia and re-assemble it. I am trying to create at Chickory something that looks like "grandmother's homestead" if in fact, I had had a grandmother with a homestead. In other words, an idealized idea about how it was but wasn't.
So I’m making this blog. In hopes that maybe some of my wizardry will rub off on you and you too will be able to fix all your electronics just by looking at it. …. and also just to blog.
I honestly see no reason to mess with Wednesday. It’s a very competitive night and the shows are all very consistent. Even in year 12, CSI ahs become one of the strongest 10p shows anywhere on the TV sked. If CBS wanted to try something new here, the opportunity might be in Jan, between Survivor cycles. For fall, I think their best bet is to leave it as it is, especially if they make moves on other nights.
The story is written so clearly and detailed that I could see the sparkle of all those Faberge eggs.
The Focus got packed to the hilt, two car seats, presents for 15 people, bags packed for a weeks travel, Peppa the dog and food for Christmas cooking all made it in and away we went. I would have taken a photo of how we got it all in, but this was one of the only times I got to drive (and you should not use your phone and drive at the same time).
Line 6: and I'll drag you to Hell, my friend. b
A beer and a brewery I have been wanting to try for a while, Great Divide's Yeti is a multiple award winning Imperial Stout. Black as the abyss with a dark sticky head. The smell is roasty and a lot hoppier than I had anticipated. The taste is huge and complex like an Imperial Stout should be! Bittersweet chocolate, caramel and toffee, then finally a big, musty, dry, woody finish. It doesn't have that currant flavor that a lot of RISs do. Velvety texture and so drinkable you need to be careful that the Yeti's 9.5% ABV doesn't unleash your untamed side. Superior lacing, as well. Every sip is a little different. The hops are more noticeable as it warms.
Sheltered, 16-year-old Catherine is about to find out. Unwitting heir to the Ancient Onyxes, she flees an arranged marriage only to stumble upon the cat’s secrets, the force of the ancient relic she wears, and the dangerous mission they must undertake.
This is much better. You need to polish it though, and the best way I know to do that is to say the words aloud. If they sound clunky, if it doesn't flow, change it. At this point you're going to be taking out or moving words, or changing syllables.
Sources said that the Saudi diplomatic mission was unhappy with the rector over his “liberal policies”, particularly when it came to accommodating members of the Shia community. “During the recent cultural week held at the university, the Saudi embassy asked the rector to not invite the Iranian ambassador and his wife to the event, but the rector refused to comply,” the source added.
Claire Perry, the Tory MP who chaired the Independent Parliamentary Inquiry on Online Child Protection, said: ‘While parents should be responsible for their children’s online safety, in practice, people find it difficult to put content filters on the plethora of internet-enabled devices in their homes.It’s time that Britain’s internet service providers, who make more than £3billion a year from selling internet access services, took on more of the responsibility to keep children safe.’
Work Work Work
-Socrates drank the conium (1972, Polydor)
2nd PRIZE £400
Opposite this view is this picture of the TPE Highway tracks. I have always thought the two tracks are joined. Now I see that they are not.
shaped paper is K & co Mira Citrus Botanical
Yellow Earth - Chen Kaige
In addition to assessing the person’s general level of health, readings can reveal other data, including energy quotients; internal areas of irritation, degeneration, injury, or inflammation; nutritional and chemical imbalances; accumulation of toxins; life transitions; and subconscious tensions.
Stage #2 – I decide to accept the love and return it! Love begets love! This is the best stage.
It’s official: Pandora’s got a crappy business model, but a crap-load of users. Sound familiar? It does to Wall Street, which is now starting to run, not walk, away from this dog. But maybe the troubled fish that is interactive radio would do fine in another pond, which is why everyone wants in.
you are my life, and i am your breath,
The international economic crisis has not been resolved. Billions were thrown at banks and none of it trickled down to jobs. Rather the big banks, speculators and corporate elite used it for personal bonuses, to continue speculative trading and to “rationalize” their companies, increasing capital expenditure and cutting employees to assure returns for stockholders. As American workers. wage packages (wages, COLAS, pensions and healthcare) are slashed in an “employer's market” here at home, across the world in China workers. wages are rising under the pressure of a working class which holds, on average, 435 strikes a day. Businesses, The Economist tells us, are seeking to set a price point in their purchase of labor power (the commodity that workers sell) on the international market, before they can bring jobs back to the USA. But even the most optimistic economists predict that lowering American wages would not bring back enough industrial manufacturing, or even service jobs, to put the 12-20% unemployed back to work, much less to preserve the much vaunted “middle class” lifestyle. The result is a marginalized youth, black and Latino population with no prospects for inclusion in the productive economy, and a prison industrial complex housing two million prisoners who are disproportionately people of color, and overwhelmingly come from the poorest layers of the working class.
But someday I’m gonna make it
1) Rev. John Shuck of Shuck and Jive gets one for his creative use of religion and his work on behalf of teh gays and teh peace. Organized religion is not my bag at all but if there were more people like John in it then I might change my mind, maybe.
Beat cream cheese and brown sugar in large bowl until smooth, add flour. Beat. Add eggs one at a time beating the mixture after each addition. Finally add cottage cheese and vanilla and beat until well combined. Pour over the caramel/pecan layer and spread evenly. Bake at 350 F for about 1 hour or until the center of the cheesecake has set. Let cool completely in the pan before removing the sides.
Step 1: On your day off, clean the apartment you just moved out of. Don’t forget to grab that last load of laundry from the dryer, the way I almost did. And when you sweep the basement, be sure to accidentally dump the entire contents of the dust pan into the bag of clean laundry from the dryer, the way Brandon did.
But it was his singing and his music that will endure forever.
A jihadist cell in Mexico was recently found to have a weapons cache of 100 M-16 assault rifles, 100 AR-15 rifles, 2,500 hand grenades, C4 explosives and antitank munitions. The weapons, it turned out, had been smuggled by Muslims from Iraq. According to this report, "obvious concerns have arisen concerning Hezbollah's presence in Mexico and possible ties to Mexican drug trafficking organizations (DTO's) operating along the U.S.—Mexico border."
Anyways I had been looking through all my things and realized I have tons and tons of elements that dont get used because I have been so addicted to my cutting machines ( Cricuts and Cameo ). So I decided a few times a month I am going to do up some projects using these things I have laying around. No Cricuts! No Cameo!
Every couple loads we would lie back to rest in the beds of small branches still covered with needles, look up at the sky and talk. It was exquisite.
I am a procrastinator. Probably one of the worst procrastinators I know. Over the last few months, by main source of procrastination has been watching television online (as I don’t have an actual television set). It started off with Castle, possibly my favourite show ever, but eventually I caught up with the episodes, and for the last few months have had to watch them one episode at a time. So I switched to glee, but again caught up. So I watched Castle through again. And again. Then I started playing monopoly on my computer, but it was too slow for my limited patience, so that is a less regular activity now. And so I started with a new show: Breaking Bad. A friend from Canada recommended it to me, and while I was initially not super duper amazed by it, my need for procrastination was growing so I began watching. And now it is over.
GSMC of the Tbilisi-based Ilia State University said, that epicenter of the earthquake was in Azerbaijan, about 25 kilometers from the Georgian border.
Thank you to Mira Ink for sending me a review copy.
After years of inaction and coverup, details are emerging in France of the sale of armaments by the French state-owned defense contractor DCNS to countries across the world including Pakistan, Malaysia, Chile, India, Taiwan and Saudi Arabia, with bribes and kickbacks built into DCNS’s budget, ensnaring politicians across the globe.
Without a doubt there has never in our history been a greater need for guidance than there is today. We are facing an unprecedented global economic crisis, degradation of our natural environment, widespread war and societal conflict, and human suffering that includes poverty, sickness, starvation, and exploitation. The threat of extinction looms large in this final year of the Mayan calendar. We have come face to face with the unknown and must focus our attention and energy on what really matters because time may be running short. Each moment is of great importance.
"We are led, by events and common sense, to one conclusion: The survival of liberty in our land increasingly depends on the success of liberty in other lands. The best hope for peace in our world is the expansion of freedom in all the world.
I find it deeply disturbing that my peers are choosing to enter the military in such a day and age. Two recent enlistments are college just-graduates who cannot find jobs in their area of study. Their case is not unique, but is actually a deliberate policy by the criminals in Washington. Known as military Keynesianism, it is the program of offering the military as an "employer of last resort" during economic downturns. The scum who pursue this despicable strategy then tout the lower unemployment rate.
Here’s the in-store itinerary:
Writing is a learning process on many levels, and it’s not just about the technical aspects of plot, character, and conflict. Those things go on inside the writer’s mind all the time when dealing with real life. And since a notebook is a writer’s constant companion, she’d best make friends with it.
Anne Robinson: In traffic, what ‘j’ is where two roads meet?
Jude in London is part 2 of a trilogy. For a flavour, I recommend the aforelinked extract; and The Great Hargeisa Goat Bubble, a surreal satire of economic madness first published in the Financial Times as a standalone piece and later incorporated into Jude. Both showcase Gough’s freewheeling style and flair for farce.
I loved everything about Thailand: the white sand, the turquoise waters, the fantastic food and the wonderful people. I can now understand why people seem to go back there over and over again, with so many different places to see and so many islands to choose from — where do you even begin?
So what do you think? Which side will prevail in the all-Irish Heineken Cup final? Leave a comment and let us know your views.
What I plan to do is to buy a stock that goes up in price when the stock market falls. The stock is very liquid, it trades on a major American exchange, and it has already jumped to $26 from $20 in the past 60 days. If the market tanks like I believe it will, this stock will easily move to $100, maybe even $125.
Friday evening I took a can of brown spray paint, moved the rocks back from the paver's, and spray painted the paver's and the stepping stones. I still need to do one more coat on the tops and sides of the stepping stones, but I think it actually turned out pretty decent! We saved a ton of $$ by re-using the existing paver's that were there and just spray painting them the color we wanted. It's outdoor spray paint, so it should last for a long time! We've still got to put in top soil, and maybe sod (if the grass doesn't spread) next to the paver's, but here's where part 1 stands now:
They first meet as they are mopped up, slopped into bins and sealed in plastic, then dumped, crushed and buried in landfill.
The Guardian UK
As a matter of fact, quite simply, just for 2012, the Indians no longer need those $12 billion US Dollars that they will use for Iranian oil. If they sell those dollars on the markets, they further suppress the Dollar and demand for it. While $12 billion is a very small hit, there is such a thing as death by a thousand cuts.
now go check out the BEAUTIFUL and TALENTED
D-DAY (Austin, TX)
She looked to me for a leg up, but I told her that if she was going to take him home, she had better work out her mounting for herself---there was a scowl, a chuckle, a yes well and she scrambled onto his back, adjusted her irons and away they went.
I'm all about fast and easy. The fewer ingredients the better in my opinion. ;) This is one of those fast and easy meals that is some what of a staple in our home. We call it "beans and meat" but I think we should come up with a fancier name...
--instant streaming Netflix. What a wonderful thing.
Below - Soft and delicate greens of the sweet woodruff spreading all over the ground.
Female Hiker: "Did you see those guys coming down? They got lost last night in the storm, ended up staying the night."
Our vision of the world, shaped by our world view, and made even brighter with our vivid imaginations can be the source of many creative endeavors.
‘Tis not easy to catch me”
So I took it home and sat it in the corner, knowing I'd figure out some way to jazz it up. Then I remembered that pinterest project and I did a small happy dance.
I frankly don’t believe this has much effect on flash mobs. I think people intent on doing – particularly those intent on doing serious crime are going to care less about the possibility of getting a ticket for a curfew violation. I just don’t think that’s a reasonable deterrent…
I remember driving home that afternoon with my head in a fog, and when I got home I just hugged Jenny and held her for the longest time and promised her that everything would be okay. She needed to hear me say that. I needed to hear me say that too. I'm not sure whether or not either of us believed it, but we both needed to hear me say it. It was the day before Laura's second birthday, and we were both wondering what kind of world lay in store for her.
But a St Petersburg waterworks is putting six giant gastropods to work monitoring emissions from a sewage incinerator.
In March last year, the government scrapped plans to buy two private jets to fly the prime minister and the Royal Family around the world, citing cost and environmental reasons.
How do we find love for ourselves? How do we connect to our true center and feel whole and happy? Light and loved? It’s like I want to walk around just hugging people today. Pour out my love to whomever will receive it. I want to be connected. I don’t want to feel so isolated within what I’m doing. Being an entrepreneur and starting something from scratch can be very isolating at times. But when you have a vision and a yearning in your heart and soul to help people, sometimes you just have to do it. Even all the feelings that go along with it: the good, the bad, the lonely.
“Report Fuels Effort to Double Michigan’s Gas Tax”
You Won’t See My Cry
1-1/2 cups sour cream
Isaiah 26:4: Trust in the LORD forever, for the LORD, the LORD himself, is the Rock eternal.
I listened.... There it was again I scanned the horizon of moon swathed hills and a movement caught my eye. It was over the biggest mountain of all. Vesuvius. Squinting into the darkness I stared for a moment, then a burst of fiery, glowing sparks made me jump. I just froze with my eyes wide in terror. The ground shuddered beneath me. It jerked me into action I took to my heels and ran through the door and was over taken by the dog as I dashed back through the atrium, down the corridor and into my room and leaped like a hurdler into the covers. I yanked the covers over my head and clamped my hands over my ears, trying to block out the terrifying sound that had been haunting my dreams only minutes ago, the rumbling had grown louder but now it was calming into nothing again. The only thing that could keep me from screaming was the thin belief that this was not real and that I was dreaming." I'm dreaming" I whispered as the world fell away.Tm just dreaming..."
It shouldn’t be.
I no longer have to miss out….
The most important thing anyone can do for a person suffering from a mental health problem is to help him or her get an appropriate diagnosis and treatment from a health care professional but indeed realize that it causes prayer to come forth!
"The Owner's Cask For Shinanoya; Yamazaki Bota Corta. Distilled 1999/Bottled 2008. 56 per cent alcohol.
Returning and coming around full circle have been recurrent concepts in my life. As an immigrant, I’ve been struggling with a lot of issues over the past few years that come as part of the package, over and over again. These issues have provided some fuel for creativity and a way to really test my problem solving skills, which is a good thing. But there are times when I wonder why the hell I’m still here, and why I’m still trying to make things work. I’m as much a part of the American landscape as anyone else on the street. I’ve lived in the US longer than I’ve lived in any other country. But I grew up all over the world, so no one place has really been home unless I choose to call it home. My childhood is quite literally a figment of my imagination now, as the cities and places I’ve lived in have changed beyond recognition.
Next week, on May 3 – 4, Skills Matter launches the first-ever Progressive Java Tutorials in London, an annual Java conference offering a unique blend of product and experience mixed, and tempered with theory and practice.
On the up side:
Is it any wonder that I'm feeling a little defensive, lately?
Once back in our room, we dressed for dinner and opened the bottle of champagne we had brought with us, a graduation gift to J from his former boss in Omaha who now lives in Napa Valley. It was delicious!
A Conversation in Heaven.
Brewed: 03-18-2008
Acts 17:30-31
“The LORD is good, A stronghold in the day of trouble; And He knows those who trust in Him.” Nahum 1:7, NKJV
It lists their influences as "Pop Music 1955-2008", but I think they definitely must have a bit of Devo, Sex Pistols, Weezer, They Might Be Giants, Dead Milkmen...you know...all your geek punk rock favorites.
“Breast milk!”
We also took a trip to Bruno's favorite place - Frankenmuth, Michigan aka Christmas town USA. There is a HUGE store there, Bronners, that he just loves - there are thousands of ornaments, decorations everywhere and Christmas music. My dad just loves it there too - it brings out the calm in him. (For those of you who know my dad, yes, I'm kidding.)
I suppose I should be happy about that because of the rarity value it gives mine, but in human terms I think it’s tragic. What other war can command so many icons, so many ‘firsts’ as the Crimea? The first war photographer, first telegraph in war, first hospital train, first major trench warfare – all Crimea. Tennyson’s most famous poem –
Two workers were killed in a March 31 explosion that shut down CDT production at the Evonik plant.
said the fly and gather
Their collection goes back to the 1600s. They used to draw instead of record their stories. In 1973, they started to record their stories on cassettes tapes. Some of the first recordings at the museum were interviews from people who moved from Puerto Rico to Brooklyn. People shared their stories. In 1993 they started to interview people from Crown Heights about the 1991 riot that took place there. We sat together to read transcripts about the riot. Each of us read the words of very different people who had a different perspective on what life was like after the riot took place.
Below is a list of my top 5 essentials that new mums need to mull over before partaking in exercise after birth:
He pulled away as she grabbed for his lead rope, snorted and reared up over the top of her----she yelled and ducked as I yelled "Aye, that's enough"---he shook his head, snorted and walked up to me---I turned to she that Jenny was OK----she was standing there smiling---her father was with her---she said "He is a different horse--happy, fit but different"
These are my thoughts on the first part of Rumors of Water. You can read what others think about these chapters here.
Along the way we discuss a few key terms and also see why chronology and context are always important--especially so when things are confusing.
JOHN O’DRISCOLL: No chance of you lifting this sunbed up is there?
Tyra could have cut her some slack since AzMarie has been performing well in oppose to some other girls who remained in the competition. Azmarie’s elimination came as a huge surprise and stirred up a controversial debate among the fans and Tyra’s relentless lashing towards the contestant’s attitude but that is not the only controversy that has sparked viewers’ attention.
Oil : 1 tbsp
This is something Russell W. Glenn, formerly of the RAND Corporation—an Air Force think tank based in Southern California—calls “combat in Hell.” In his 1996 report of that name, Glenn pointed out that “urban terrain confronts military commanders with a synergism of difficulties rarely found in other environments,” many of which are technological. For instance, the effects of radio communications and global positioning systems can be radically limited by dense concentrations of architecture, turning what might otherwise be an exotic experience of pedestrian urbanism into a claustrophobic labyrinth inhabited by unseen enemy combatants.
129. “You are today where your thoughts have brought you; you will be tomorrow where your thoughts take you.” – James Allen
“Don’t try to prove it, because you’ll only hurt yourself. Rest and believe in God’s Grace. Allow His Grace, His Love, to complete you, and to know, and to experience that…you are loved.”
Goodbye Arboretum,must go to dinner now!
outside there’s a covered porch with storage cabinets against the house, an old shed, fire pit, and the whole back yard is fenced for andy, he even gets to use a doggy door if he can figure it out/fit through it. the front of the house is partly covered in ivy and has cute shutters on the windows, with a big weeping willow hanging over the unpaved driveway. the location is perfect: quiet street, close to foothills and lakes and the river, one block from a lovely park, less than half a mile from lots of my friends (including jason just two blocks away), and it cuts my commute down to about 10-15 minutes.
Then we have the grass that grows so beautifully in my garden despite my efforts to thwart it. Wish my grass was that beautiful in my front yard. Not to mention bugs galore in varieties I've never seen before. I honestly think that has to do with the organic veggies though. Conventional seeds have GOT to have something sprayed on them, they must.
Papers: Wild Rose Studio - Floral Paper Pack, Docrafts Papermania Lemon Sorbet Capsule Collection
*November 19 , 2011
First of all, we were proud to be a part of the Vancouver Not Vegas coalition, whose work, led by Sandy Garossino and Lindsay Brown, resulted in an unanimous decision by Vancouver City Council to prevent the major expansion of Edgewater Casino in our downtown. This initiative and the public discussion that has begun will inform the anticipated review of public Gaming, especially the revenues that are generated and distributed to charities. While we welcome this review, the situation for the arts and cultural groups remains dire and largely neglected. Especially as multi-year agreements have come to an end, many arts organizations are finding themselves ineligible to apply under the “new eligibility criteria” introduced by Rich Coleman in 2009. We have urged our new Premier and Minister to address this issue immediately, before a lengthy review process is completed. The $15 Million that was “restored” recently has not satisfied or addressed the pressing need in the arts and culture community, including many of our members.
I'm no good without you anyhow
As always, I remain your loyal and most humble servant,
I hate conflict, but my mother always says I should be a lawyer. That's because I like when things are "right". Logically speaking, that is. And sometimes, I argue for the things I believe to be so. But I could never be a lawyer because of the peace-seeking nature, and because I won't go against the truth. The Candor, and the Amity are in conflict with the Erudite, and I think the Erudite in me only shines through when it doesn't conflict or when it's a reflex.
I didn't really plan on doing one today it just popped up because...
1 3/4 cup cashews
12. Only Living Witness 'Voice of Disrepair'
The Color of Love File Folder Game-
Aren’t those words a comfort? Life is hard. But we have access to a mighty God. A God who trades your heavy load for a light one. A God who will not overload you and will always provide you an escape.
Our first reverse-culture shock was seeing actual highways with overpasses and center dividers. And NO animals on the road. It was amazing (yes, we probably had lost our minds a little).
strawberry jam
So, since my husband was taking the Subaru, I had to take the Honda - which I love, but which is not insured for Shmulik to drive and I don't feel like driving. Aliza is 12 years old. I can't believe that. I'm so used to 11 and 11 is still a little girl, but 12...that's so much older than 11. Anyway, she loves to talk, to share, to explain. I'm tired. I know I'm jumping around here, but that too is something I just need to do.
Mario’s got added than abundant moves to accord with his enemies.
How were your sales this week? Do you feel like there is a still a slump or are your sales picking up?
Co Author: George E. Pfautsch
Last but not least, I wanted to choose a pair of socks one of my sons, so I chose the Balmoa Kid's Low Cut Socks in a size 4-6, this way they wil fit my one year old son that wears a size five. The pack contains three different pairs of socks in a unique print and mix of colors. There is a Gray/White pair, Black/White pair, and Black/Gray pair. Each sock features a USA logo print on it. As with all of their other socks, if your purchase four packs you will receive an entire 25% off!
I finished this book today and I haven’t started a new one yet. I gave this book 5 stars, you can check out my review here! What are you reading this lovely Tuesday?
The last decennia we could find in the internet a blessing to be able to communicate more easily with each other and to share opinions. This open free space is under threat.
Evan Nepean.
Omigod! First they want you to move, then they want you to stop moving occasionally! WHEN WILL THESE TOTALITARIAN DICTATORS MAKE UP THEIR MINDS?!
Eureka (season premiere), Syfy, 9PMLost Girl (season premiere), Syfy, 10PMTwins/Yankees, ESPN, 7PM76ers/Magic, NBA TV, 7PMBruins/Capitals Game 3, NBC Sports Network, 7:30PMBlues/Sharks Game 3, NBC Sports Network, 10PMThunder/Clippers, NBA TV, 10:30PMRangers/Senators Game 3, CNBC, 7:30PMHow I Met Your Mother, CBS, 8PMBones, Fox, 8PMThe Voice, NBC, 8PMDancing With The Stars, ABC, 8PMThe Secret Life of the American Teenager, ABC Family, 8PMGossip Girl, CW, 8PM2 Broke Girls, CBS, 8:30PMTwo And A Half Men, CBS, 9PMHouse, Fox, 9PMTwo and A Half Men, CBS, 9PMWWE Raw, USA, 9PMAmerican Chopper: Senior vs. Junior, Discovery, 9PMMake It or Break It, ABC Family, 9PMMike & Molly, CBS, 9:30PMJesse James: Outlaw Garage, Discovery, 10PMRob Dyrdek’s Fantasy Factory, MTV, 10PMCastle, ABC, 10PMSmash, NBC, 10PM
This leads to the main idea of the novel: Jack and Babette are both terrified of death. This secret fear dominates every aspect of their lives, with the only salvation being endless distractions. ”Who will die first? This question comes up from time to time, like where are the car keys. It ends a sentence, prolongs a glance between us. I wonder if the thought itself is part of physical love, a reverse Darwinism that awards sadness and fear to the survivor. Or is it some inert element in the air we breathe, a rare thing like neon, with a melting point, an atomic weight?” For Jack, only the formidable presence of Hitler represents a power that is large enough to neutralize and protect him from his own fear of death. Babette teaches a posture class to retirees, and secretly prostitutes herself to gain access to an experimental drug that will suppress fear of dying. Murray suggests to Jack that the best method to ward off death is to take another’s person life. Jack hatches a plan to kill his wife’s ersatz lover (with a gun that was cryptically given to Jack by his vagabond father-in-law), the inventor of the (ineffective) drug. The final series of events leaves both men wounded and in a hospital run by German nuns. Jack is shocked to discover that the nuns themselves don’t believe in God or an afterlife. ”You don’t believe in heaven? Your dedication is a pretense?” ”Our presence is a dedication. As belief shrinks from the world, people find it more necessary than ever that someone believe…Nuns in black…Fools, children…We surrender our lives to make your nonbelief possible. There is no truth without fools.” ”I don’t want to hear this,” he protests. ”This is terrible.” ”But true,” she answers.
277...sweet friends who check on our sick one, and pray
Preheat the oven to 350°F. Grease and flour a 9 x 5 inch loaf pan.
At this point, what we do is we start to take the “minimal enagement with our worldly life” strategy. In my case, for example, I had a 10 year period of my life where my main goal was to minimize the amount of “normal work” I had to do. For example, I would take jobs that demanded very little of me and that were below what my normal career potential would have been. I did so so that I had “more free time” to “do Dharma.” Then, when the people I worked for came in and asked me to do things, I became internally upset, frustrated and dissassatisfied with having to do these things. I would only minimally engage in my work, out of a strange fear of being somehow contaminated by having to engage in “worldly activities”. So not only was I taking jobs below what my normal capacity would have been, I was underperforming in them.
Yesterday. Full sun, glittering sky. It started off with truly solid creative intentions. I got my coffee and was about to head back to my studio (the living room floor) when the car changed direction & went bound for the mountains. (New Jersey does have them!) "Just a wee drive on the ridge," I said, "then I'll go back." Up Skyline Drive I chugged. Hiking sign & the entrance to the trails caught my eye. Car stopped. "Just a little stroll," I said, "and then I'll go back." Beyond my coffee & journal I wasn't equipped for a hike. Think ballet flats. But I had finally dug up a decent map of the place and I had read intriguing things about a beautiful lake and an abandoned mansion nestled in the interior of the forest. And the mood was right, which made the usual gear & other requirements seem dispensable. Off I went. "Just to the lake," I said, "and then I'll go back."
Therefore, you can say that, compared to ancient art or even the more recent art of previous centuries, this is a kind of lawlessness, because the artist are letting them-selves go and doing what is against all the laws.
Apparently Emerie was worn out from all that singing & excitement,
One of the best parts of transferring to BYU was getting the opportunity to take a Hindi class. Hindi, in addition to being the language of Bollywood cinema, is closely related to Urdu, a language with a poetic tradition I'm particularly enthralled with, and to my grandfather's native language, Punjabi (which, despite my great-grandmother's efforts, I'd never learned). Understandably, the small liberal arts college I came from did not offer Hindi, so I was very excited to be in a school that did.
So today my layout is about everyday happiness. If you are like me
Just one part of you to cling to
there was nothing proper
amadou n,; tinder made from tree-growing fungi, also used as styptic. Useful to know next time you are in a forest & need to stop bleeding. Very Ray Mears sort of information.
This social context sheds much light on the crisis facing the bride and groom at the wedding feast of Cana. But it also gives us insight into Mary’s role in this scene. Mary is the first to notice the impending disaster. She alone is aware of what is about to unfold, and she brings this crisis to the one person who can solve the problem: Jesus.
With all the students gathered in the Hall,
The album—which is currently being previewed in its entirety on Icelandair’s in-
Suggestions please...white or not or part white?? I am also still on the
Our family altar sits upon our entertainment unit ~ our unit contains a fairly big TV screen. We do not have normal channels connected to it, only EWTN. Behind the right hand door of the entertainment unit we use to have a stereo and speakers, but upon going over to iphone, we now listen to our music via the phone and a dock. So in that, now spare space, we keep an old computer so that we can convert the TV into a computer screen and it is from there that we show our slidshow images, using the computer.
What transpires between Willard and Kurtz is less a traditional climax to a film like this but instead a more personal examination of humanity and morality. It plays out in this nebulous space between surrealism and the base reality of the jungle, set among the ruins of a Cambodian temple. The resolution here isn’t one of action, but of the spirit.
“But the men were very good to us, and we were not hurt nor did we miss anything as long as we accompanied them, when we were in the fields.” 1 Samuel 25:15
Here is a beautiful tribute by a son to his mother: “I don’t remember much about her views of voting nor her social prestige; and what her ideas on child training, diet, and eugenics were, I cannot recall. The main thing that sifts back to me now through the thick undergrowth of years is that she loved me. She liked to lie on the grass with me and tell stories, or to run and hide with us children. She was always hugging me. . . . And I liked it. She had a sunny face. To me it was like God, and all the beatitudes saints tell of Him. And sing! Of all the sensations pleasurable to my life nothing can compare with the rapture of crawling up into her lap and going to sleep while she swung to and fro in her rocking chair and sang. Thinking of this, I wonder if the woman of today, with all her tremendous notions and plans, realizes what an almighty factor she is in shaping of her child for weal or woe? I wonder if she realizes how much sheer love and attention count for in a child’s life.”
As the geneticist J. B. S. Haldane remarked, "The most frequently asked question is: 'Which came first, the chicken or the egg?' The fact that it is still asked proves either that many people have never been taught the theory of evolution or that they don't believe it."
by Barry Lundquist
I've got in touch with my hop supplies (Charles Farams and Botanix) to find out which of the true Goldings varieties are sold today and they told me Cobbs, Mathons, Early Bird and perhaps a few Canterbury Whitebines, though both companies sell them as 'Goldings' and 'East Kent Goldings'.
A self-supporting government enterprise, the U.S. Postal Service is the only delivery service that reaches every address in the nation, 150 million residences, businesses and Post Office Boxes. The Postal Service receives no tax dollars for operating expenses, and relies on the sale of postage, products and services to fund its operations. With 32,000 retail locations and the most frequently visited website in the federal government, usps.com, the Postal Service has annual revenue of more than $67 billion and delivers nearly 40 percent of the world’s mail. If it were a private sector company, the U.S. Postal Service would rank 29th in the 2010 Fortune 500. Black Enterprise and Hispanic Business magazines ranked the Postal Service as a leader in workforce diversity. The Postal Service has been named the Most Trusted Government Agency six consecutive years and the sixth Most Trusted Business in the nation by the Ponemon Institute.
So what's the plan?
Or at least the kind of writing I want to do.
Well it’s been quite the long haul but WE MADE IT after a few inconveniences of course! It is not a Dewey family trip without some bump in the road! So our adventure started Wednesday evening, we arrived in Sacramento to stay the night for our early flight out to Portugal the next day. We got into Sacramento around 7 and had a very nice dinner at the Virgin Sturgeon off Garden Highway. If you have never tried it, I highly recommend it. The restaurant is actually a barge right on the river with great views. The restaurant does not look like much but the food is very good! I had a carnitas place which was to die for! After dinner, we headed to the hotel to check in. Walking into the lobby, it is FULL with high school students and their parents. Some kind of track meet had been going on all week. Mind you, it is already 9 p.m. and there is one girl working the front desk. So we patiently wait our turn to be helped only to find out that there was a mistake with our reservation. Apparently the third party we booked our reservation with messed up the date as well as contacting the hotel to book the room. Luckily the hotel had one room available, the only catch was that it only had a king size bed. So Jake and I got the pleasure of sharing a pull out couch bed all night! LOL. I told you it wouldn’t be a Dewey family vacation without some bumps in the road!
Personally, I like the sense of mystery when dealing with the unknown - in beer and in life - but if I did want some information I'd either ask the (usually pretty well informed) person stood behind the bar, or I'd read the words on a bottle's label. After all, like most grown ups, I do tend to read the words these days rather than look at the pictures.
Celebrating Piper's 8th birthday today.
Finale
Anyway. I’m sorry, Hugo.
His mother was well aware of this fact and joined us in a ruckus of appropriate behavior. Never breathing nor thinking nor seeing I was there. Her ruckus swept him away, although not the fire he left behind.
Occasionally I remind myself that if not for Samuel Pepys and his diary, so much of the day-to-day life of old England would have been lost. Pepys (pronounced peeps) wrote about the mundane, the day-to-day life of living in London in the 17th century, but he also wrote about the big things too: the plague, the Great Fire of London.
I’m really hoping that my training will be solid and my knee will hold up, which means I am analyzing all the training plans I received yesterday and am trying to figure out the best way to proceed. I have a few months to build my base before training really begins, so I’m not too worried about the training plan yet. I do plan on keeping up with yoga, stretching and foam rolling in order to keep my IT band and knee in check.
Getting back to Mugabe's 'Second Liberation' (or Afro-fascism, to term it more appropriately); one shudders to contemplate the consequences of his quest to reassert Africa's original identity, especially given the results of a not dissimilar endeavour currently underway in the Muslim world. Driven by a handful of fanatics, this quest on the other side of the world has even managed to put a spell on moderate (real) Muslims tired of having to dance to the tunes of the over-bearing West. But then, who can blame them. The hubris of the West has sacrificed natural diversity on the altar of enforced equality in order to placate the feel-good sensibilities of those who have lost their sense of self (identity). Alas, the logical outcome of a relativist world-view desperately trying to ground itself.
Now his leads us to the thing that all PCVs spend most of their time talking about: FOOD. I'm creating a guide to Cambodia, where I'll list cities, places to stay, and where to eat, but until then let me list some of the best places I ate this weekend.
Secondly, this demented theory that mass immigration is the solution to coping with an ageing population, assumes that all the new arrivals which the establishment is so frantically importing have discovered the secret of eternal youth, and will never, become pensioners themselves.
Now I was pleased much that such an old book had fallen into my hands; the which, when I had but a little way perused, I found my condition, in his experience, so largely and profoundly handled, as if his book had been written out of my heart. This made me marvel; for thus thought I, This man could not know anything of the state of Christians now, but must needs write and speak the experience of former days.
I remember I had a huge smile on my face the entire night, hail fellow well met. I was not smiling inside. I left fairly early that night as the festivities continued with the group of 10 or so… I think I used as an excuse that my wife was waiting for me at home… I wonder how many times I have excused myself from such situations because I was so uncomfortable in my own skin.
1 cadillac
Make it easy to be near you
Episode 20 "Hiruko against two kunoichi"
Indeed, the Market Vectors Vietnam ETF (VNM) is intriguing. Nevertheless, it’s an investment where you’d be well-advised to tread lightly.
Divided we fall!
By saying this I am by no means implying that all Asians or all Africans are from the devil, --- for since ancient times Cain influence has journeyed to all corners of this earth and to all nations. The elite followers of his ways have long ago, in an attempt to play God, taken control of the world’s resources and finances, and are sitting in high places, busy figuring out how best to take control of our minds.
But anglers spend about half as much time fishing as they did back then.
Ok, so she never called me, but maybe she deserves a little post on my humble blog.
Whether your little bundle of joy still resides in your womb or lives in his or her own home, you are still a mom... and we all know - there ain’t no love like a momma’s love!
in life when fate came along and struck my way.
A doe with one ear forward and one ear cupped back:
Team with the worst cards: Yankees. The Paul O'Neill card is pretty good and may have been a better choice than Kelly. But all the others are very straight-forward.
I was thinking about some of my wants (like, how much money I’d like to earn, what kind of house I would like to live in, what kind of relationship I would like to have with a man) and then I was thinking, is it o.k. for me to have wants since I am a wife? Doesn’t my being a wife preclude me from having wants? That because I am married, my wants simply didn’t come into the question?
We stick together
If so, then you’re beginning to “tune in” as well. And guess what? Every major religion has small enclaves of people lifting into this exact consciousness at the same time. In fact, as we begin to see a more lived spirituality across many religious traditions, we can say there is an “authentic spirituality” being demonstrated now for all to see.
Holly Wright
How Long O Lord, DA Carson, 126
One of my favourite places to shop is… Dollarama! Although you really need to have time and patience, because it’s notoriously difficult to find what you’re looking for – and to walk out with only what you were looking for. I was only trying to find a glass jar, and ended up with cute extras that I couldn’t help buying.
This past weekend I put final paint roller to giant wall and primed the 18 ft expanse in prep to paint it next weekend.
In a book review for the Salisbury Review of Spring 2003 Sir Alfred Sherman, former senior advisor to Mrs Thatcher and leader writer on the Jewish Chronicle, recalled a friend in race relations had asked him to take a look at the reception areas of Deptford and Southall in the mid 60’s, “ I was horrified. My natural vague sympathies for the immigrants, strangers in a foreign land, was replaced by strong but hopeless sympathy for the British victims of mass immigration, whose home areas were being occupied. I was made aware of a disquieting evolution in “Establishment” attitudes towards what they called immigration or race relations and I dubbed “colonialisation.” The well-being and rights of immigrants and ethnic minorities had become paramount. The British working classes, hitherto the object of demonstrative solicitude by particularly the New Establishment on the left, but the working classes had acquired new status as the enemy, damned by the all-purpose pejorative “racists.”
I am entering this in the following challenges:
We continue to make steady progress at Foci. We're still just scratching the surface as we acquire the basic skills but we can see improvements from month to month. I started a set on our Flickr page where I'm uploading photos of our work and sequencing them in order from newest to oldest so we'll be able to see the progression over time a little more easily. Most of the pieces in the set are from the last six weeks or so. Our early, primitive stuff isn't in there.
The Berlin administrative court stopped the show from going ahead on Friday, saying that animal protection laws forbid an animal from being harmed in any way in a show. The artist had argued that Germany's constitution "unconditionally guarantees artistic freedom."
There is, I have to tell you, very little better than watching a pal succeed, and so, ladies and gentlemen, ghuls, crows and children, it is with pleasure that I introduce you to Jon Mayhew!
There are so many spinning plates right now. So many things I’m not doing well. So many things I can’t figure out. So many things that crash and break.
Foreign aid is in the news again and particularly that given to India. A country that by it’s own admission neither wants nor needs it and actually asked last year for it to be stopped. It is embarrassing to them amongst other reasons because they have a foreign aid program of their own which gives out more than they receive. We are simply passing on cash to a foreign nation for further dispersal to destinations unknown.
Well, after walking along for about 30 minutes and covering at least 3/4 of a mile, we decided the ranger was somehow mistaken. We saw no fields of flowers or any discernible entrance or transition to Cascade Canyon. So we turned around and headed back to Inspiration Point and then, from there, found the trail that would take us around Jenny Lake and back to the Visitor's Center. To make a long story fairly short, we walked and walked and walked, and then walked some more! We actually did not mind this unplanned excursion, except we were worried about the dogs being left for so long in the Trek. And we were very glad to have that apple juice.
1.The Small Things - she has THE best hair tutorials I've seen. Very easy to follow videos that show you step by step how to do each style. My new favorite hairdo - her messy ponytail/bun!
We encountered sprinklers in one yard and driveway. It was a hot day and the sprinklers felt good, but the water stinks like sulfur. Reign did not like the sprinklers and Katie dismounted to walk him through - I really liked that!
femininity, love, sexuality, survival of the species.
Just like the marketing specialist that sent me these products to review, Denise, I work in animal rescue! This product is very thorough! Which is excellent! It can make my floors look new again! As you can imagine, with Pet Rescueing, there is ALOT of this needed!
spending time with my mom and sister yesterday
“We all just went there thinking it was going to be a cool, chilled day and right at the end it got crazy,” said Salsbery, 26.
Why am I telling you about this? Zombies, my friends! An article just came out in the journal Animal Behaviour which describes how a Strepsipteran species ( Xenos vesparum) changes its host (a European hornet Polistes dominulus) into a zombie. Under the control of the parasite, the infected hornets gather, allowing the male and female Strepsiptera to come together and mate. Here’s a summary.
That's all for now peeps, till next post and thank you for reading=)
Overall, I enjoyed this book. It’s no on my favorite shelf but it was a nice read. Those who enjoy WWII based suspense they will enjoy this book. I give this book a three and a half out of five.
Freckles: League* Jen Freckles -Medium (Tattoo Layer)
I took some other pictures of this pendant on a cushion from my favorite chair my Mom gave me (she found it at a yard sale and gifted it to me when she replaced it with a posh club chair), and I just loved them because they MATCHED so perfectly and I was dying to use them as the main photo for my item on Etsy, but the pendant just seemed to disappear. I used one of them anyway for the second picture. This is my favorite one:
Boy, was I wrong. I first spent two days scouring Venice visiting the tourist essentials and I only managed to find ONE store that sold kitchen equipment; it was closed. Then, when my friend and I went to Rome, I miraculously found a shop that specialized in only Italian goods. There, I found a coffee pot and bought it with full confidence that it would be a bona fide 100% Italian product (I even asked the shopkeeper if the espresso maker was of Italian origin and he assured me that it was). I walked out of the shop, shopping bag proudly clutched in hand.
Together we make chapters
Sayid saunters into camp and Sawyer asks him where he's been. Sayid needs to speak to Locke in private; the two men walk into the jungle. Sawyer suspiciously watches them
Here is a better picture which was my Steam profile avatar when my name was “Peppermint Starfarts.”
Hey guys, this is Andrew C. Paladie, or for short ACP, and I am reporting to you here on my epic blog. I know, I know. I have NOT been posting lately. Actually I haven’t been posting at all! What’s up with that? That’s why I decided to come back to you people with my life and how I have been. Lately a few things have been happening. #1: I’ve been updating on a Youtube account I used to have last year during the month of September. I posted a video of the MW3 trailer along with some good background music to make the video more interesting. By all means, please check it out. I would love for you to give me some feedback on Youtube of what you think of it, or if you don’t have a Youtube account you can just simply leave a comment here or if you think I should really hear your opinion and the last two are out of the picture, just leave me an e-mail. If all fails, you’re screwed.
-1.5 story, 4 bedroom, 2 bath
And the best thing is, I can pamper myself with a "real" morning coffee instead of an instant one... With sugar and lots of cream...
However, the tank’s driver, Brijesh Kumar, jumped to safety through the vehicle’s emergency window.
For all the pre-vivors, survivors, those who have past - my love to you all!
Israel, and other Western nations could suffer horrendous consequences if this madness is not reversed.
I like getting letters. I like seeing a new email in my inbox. And I know of nobody who doesn't feel some small anticipation at the sound of the letterbox flapping in the morning. Something for my eyes only, from someone who thought me worthy of some words today.
This week, we are teaming up with Invacare, a leading manufacturer of home and long-term care products, to spotlight the winners of their Real Life campaign. The campaign, launched in April of 2011, brings to light achievements of those with disabilities. A contest was held to spotlight those who have triumphed over their disability. Four winners were selected — each received $9000 for them and their charity of choice. Today, we feature the remarkable story of Pauline Victoria Aughe.
nights of a heart that came to settle
There were eight different demands of Bersih, but to me, there is essentially one and it’s the only reason I came out on the streets. It is so that we can be heard and counted. It is so that, when election arrives, each vote will matter.
Scroll Left Scroll Right
He found out that a police search dog was in use to track the fugitive. We surmised from the ambulance that the fugitive had been found. Alas, no need for the Clint Eastwood gear.
Puff the Magic Dragon ... ABC Family ... 8:30 AM
Forget your wife, forget your father,
During the first week we have our Kissing Hand project. After reading the story we spend time retelling the story as a class. We had the Hershey kiss pre-cut and gave the kids the 3 sequencing pictures and a sheet of foil. This one wasn't the best but I snapped a picture for a friend so it's what I've got! I also use a red marker and draw a heart in all students hands and send them off with a Hershey kiss. I got lots of emails that night from parents who loved the heart and the kiss their child brought home. :-)
Words are not the problem, it's facing what they mean that Goldberg can't handle. "Israel-firster" is literally more descriptive than any of the terms he uses to demonize his opponents. To the extent "neo-Nazi", "fascist", and "anti-semitic" mean anything it amounts to "anti-jew" - which is exactly the kind of thing a jew-firster would be concerned about. Jefferey Goldberg is both a jew-firster and an Israel-firster. Israel and jews literally come first in his mind.
once upon a time, as a newbie CL furniture hound, i neglected to ask the "tippy" questions and ended up with lovely lois and curvy carl---who stunk up a cigarette tsunami. yup...smelled like bar-hounds and were sent to the garage to de-stink for many a moon. some serious sanding and plenty 'o paint helped lois shed her smoky skin and step into a lazy, glazey grey. (carl's still hangin' about de-stinkin')
Karen shares a surname with a well-known rock
This Blanket is once again a stunner. Do you remember she also made 'Still Waters' which I showcased on February 17th.
Serve with rye bread, crackers, and/or cut fresh vegetables such as carrots, celery, bell pepper strips, green onions, etc.
After dealings with a flat tire and a car battery that didn’t want to stay charged, I was ready to go home. After getting in our cabin ( with air conditioning, what a relief!) and having the usual camp food of hot dogs for supper, my night was turning out way better than I expected; especially after we went to the camp zoo. If I can’t see my own horses, the next best thing is exotic animals and miniature horses. After team building with Hulu hoops and noodles ( the colorful water floaty kind), I thought it was time for bed. But with twenty other girls in one cabin and a very intense game of Buzzword, I finally for to climb into my bed at one o clock. The next day we had a whole new load of adventures waiting for us outside our cabin. After another wonderful meal of camp food (this time it was pop tarts) we struggled into rope harnesses and helmets.
I shall end it here …. Forgive me should anyone who come across the blog and feel offended by what I wrote … forgive me and May Allah guide us all. AMIN!
ISBN: 9780525423270
Honestly, guys, having a cold really drains all of the smarts right out of you. I have no idea what to write a post about.
DATE: December 27, 2011
"She was happy. She wants me to tell my mom."
i recently started going to yoga with a bunch of kick-ass elderly polish women, who also make me feel like a pathetic loser as per my inability to hold the downward dog without my arms turning to jello and my ass wobbling all over the place, not to mention the instructor drawing attention (gently, lovingly, but still...) to my crooked painful crotchety hip. and while i search for the inner peace that yoga is supposed to bring, i must admit to myself that i fucking hate yoga.
Fag packets are boring, no matter what is on them. Short of doing a "Tenants", and putting photos of girls in bikinis on them, there is nothing that a fag manufacturer can do to make them so "titillating" that people would start to smoke simply because of a logo or design.
It's been a strange few days. I found $10 in the street. I got a free leg of lamb.
3.Keep
So here we are, having not gotten a challenge out on time for a couple of days and there’s that huge temptation to throw up my hands and call it a day. Writing can be like that. We have a great idea, get seven chapters into the story and stop for whatever reason, only to find out that later on we have no momentum, and can’t even remember how the next scene was supposed to go.
MUMBAI: Indian diamond exporters are relying more on the Asia Pacific market than on the US, the world’s biggest importer. Demand from China has gone up 40% over the last year while Japan has been buying premium diamonds in large volumes.
So much my heart like to say,
Wednesday our grace period ended. BAM! We were hit with the flu and one by one we fell. First my son (and he has pneumonia too), then I got it, about 10 seconds later Kevin got it, and our last little hold out succumbed to the virus last night.
Voila, the top 10 tips that came to my mind for the budget-conscious tourist visiting Paris. Hope it’ll come in useful for some.
My point in showcasing this particular Take Ten cover is to demonstrate how one type of papercrafting project can inspire others. Plus, it's a pretty easy CAS inspiration to start with. We'll move onto more challenging inspirations (such as modern art and the Nabisco logo and that really cool table cloth at Target) as we go!
An NT who doesn't accept their partner's label will simply brush off their partner's traits as;
I think we need to forget that old adage that ignorance is bliss and move towards embracing the fact that knowledge IS power! We need to educate ourselves on what is really going into our bodies and decide for ourselves if it is something we are comfortable with. Do not be a lab rat unknowingly. Do not just trust that food companies have your best interest at heart. Trust yourself, love yourself and become an advocate for true, healthy, whole REAL foods. How can you do this?
Read the rest of the interview after the break
Even prior to his election, he had ensured that his entire paper trail of birth certificates, passports, college records, and other items most people can produce in under five minutes were “sealed” from public review, despite the fact that most modern presidents have had to submit their personal records, short of a colonoscopy exam, for examination. Among his first executive orders was one issued on January 21, 2009 to ensure none of these records saw the light of day.
to open it, just took a pic of what was there, you know?
Since joining Google in 2010, we have been creating editing magic in Google products while continuing to keep Picnik awesome. But now we get to focus on even awesomer things. Picnik will be closing on April 19, 2012.
~Pages contain the Grimm Brothers version of Sleeping Beauty.
I'm also 99% sure that this dude never coached a youth team in his life. At least, not one in North Carolina. *glower* Not that I'm bitter or anything...
Some might argue that a few of my titles don't meet the minimum requirements of 'concept album.' I conclude that a concept can be dictated by the overall mood of the recording, particularly one that is not reflected elsewhere in the artist's body of work. Peculiarly, a good many of these records have an autumnal flavor, including the "rock opera" selections. Here's my list:
"About 80%. I like pork chops".
going to be BIG SHOT!!!
The entire process of finding a dress was harder than I thought it was going to be, and I was spending quite a bit of time searching online and in stores. I finally found a beautiful dress, and it surprised me! It was different from all the dresses I looked at online. I actually picked it to try on because I liked its teal color very much. Sometimes finding the right dress is pure serendipity!
Despite repeated warnings by members of the City Council, leaders and organizations… crying out in the wilderness of central Brooklyn and other urban settings urging investment; who for too long have been dependent primarily upon religious and civic volunteers and their individual small donations - the Mayor is finally showing up late to the carnage.
The street proved to be atreasur hiding beautiful second hand stores and ' T-Michael` store and Lisas 'secondLove' which is more like a treasure cabine than just a vintage/second hand store.
No more than 2 cups of 1% Milk a day (or skim but we cant drink skim! lol)
Join us for breakfast and hear the latest news from six companies, plus views on the state of the industry and the buzz at the show. Please RSVP towendy@bubblesqueak.co.uk.
There is a room in my house, as I assume there is in many of your houses, that has become "The Slash Room." In this case, it is the guest/closet/junk/spare/hobby room. It is a room that seems to draw all the extra crap that doesn't have a place. It is the room where out-of-towners too cheap to spring for a hotel sleep. It also is where childish things get banished, things like say, baseball cards. This is where I spend a great deal of my spare time, in this spare room. My mission? To whittle down all my excess cardboard into a manageable and enjoyable collection. The "small collection" idea has been a work in progress 2+ years running. Once you could barely walk into this room without nearly killing yourself on a crate full of 800-count boxes, now there has been a lot of headway made.
Suddenly her groans became deeper
9. Sun Green – 12:03
The little birds are piping yet
3. Pour the curd mixture & stir continuously. Add salt to taste.
What should it look like?
Like most writers, I have a day job to pay the bills. And I have one child still in high school and one in college. My daughter in high school keeps up pretty busy with her athletics and the various academic activities we've had the pleasure to share with her. And we have a big house and with a big lots that needs a lot of spring clean up. Those are my excuses for not getting writing done over the past month.
Mr. Romney might want to dismiss his political opponents as nothing but haters because he’s wealthy. But the fact that he dismisses people concerns with such contempt only reinforces the belief that he could not care less about what these people are feeling and their fears. As far as he’s concerned, he has nothing to apologize for. It all boils down to the fact that what he really cares about is making sure that the people who are successful will continue to enjoy their success. Success will be rewarded. But on the flipside, being poor will be punished.
BM: I know that’s an ordinary question but I’m not a good one for rating people. I loved all the guys that Burton was in with: Robert Shaw, Richard Harris, who is just terrific, and Peter O’Toole.
Come have fun at our event, but you can really help us now by blogging, linking, tweeting, anything to get the word out! If you want to volunteer, send a tweet to @snax or visit our Volunteer page on the Austin Twestival wiki.
but they are really good as we walk and walk and walk and walk.
My sister is a speech-language pathologist for the French-speaking school community in downtown Toronto. I thought this bag would be a fun way for her to carry around some of her materials. I added her initials to the back of the bag using Gypsy Font.
Plans have been in the works for months. Emma, the housekeeper and surrogate mother to the Hemphill daughters, is baking Glory a fine cake. Frankie, Glory’s best friend, cannot wait to drench everyone with his new and much improved cannonball. Older sister, Jesslyn, is bringing her pep squad friends, but she promises they will snag a corner umbrella and talk about boys and Elvis completely ignoring others.
In other news, you can see this rather curious experimental cup I am excited about plus the rather nifty patterned bowl experiment....
They were found in the same region where some 800 dolphins washed ashore earlier this year. The cause of their death is still being investigated.
Starting research on a blog post or Bible lesson and it’s unlikely I’ll stop until it’s finished, although I may have a movie or TV show going in the background.
Instead of attacking the system at its heart, sadly, you went to its fringes and in doing so inflicted purely collateral damage. I’m no expert where rowing is concerned and the University Boat Race leaves me utterly cold as a spectacle but I suspect its 18 participants last Saturday are beyond reproach where graft and commitment are concerned. What’s more, the message you received from one of them afterwards – a masterpiece of controlled derision – probably speaks volumes as to their average IQ.
I stamped the two ladies and other details using Jet Black StazOn and
I can't make anything this beautiful.
Abecedarians moved to Caroline one year later for their debut EP Eureka. Resin followed in 1987. Two compilations have since been released: AB-CD, which is a collection of nearly all of Eureka and Resin, plus the Factory single and this compilation of early tracks and demos.
I know I only have myself and 6,000 glasses of Pinot Grigio to blame, but man do I ever feel like Hell. Ugh. I seem to recall hitting on a gay man for a while. And I have two mystery injuries on my knees, which means I fell down at some point during the evening. Classy! And I vaguely remember grabbing the mike of one of the cheesy Sweeny Sisters-esque wedding singers and belting out the Jane Wiedlin part in the bridge of "Our Lips Are Sealed" and later, posing for compromising digital photos at the Bar at the Four Seasons. My significant cleavage and pointy tongue will be coming to a website near you soon, I'm sure.
Fraserburgh's self appointed beer upstarts, BrewDog, have just announced the second stage of their Equity For Punks share offering which they hope will raise over £2.2 million. This cash will be used to reinvest in a bigger brewery that will allow them to keep pace with the demand for their beers. BrewDog have released 90,000 shares in the company at a price of £23.75 per share. However, the minimum purchase is four shares or an investment of £95.
Without further ado, here are some highlights of my interview with Beverly Johnson.
Billy Bragg, Singer/Songwriter (UK)
One would think that in this country leaders would have learned from our own history, but they have not.
When I first spoke to my editor on the phone, I was a nervous wreck about it for days, practicing my “professional persona,” only to find her so comfortable to talk to that we were telling each other silly personal stories right off the bat.
When I turn it over to show its pedigree (like you all do)...well, not much of a pedigree. It is Hong Kong, not Royal This or Royal That. Above the emblem are some scratchy black letters that say, "NOT FOR FOOD USE." Oh dear, I guess I can't show you a picture of me drinking Aveda tea (soft and soothing).
So this is what I wore today!
“If your personality matched you’re exterior, you’d be awesome.”
My family has always been first & foremost in my life, making "home keeping" my #1 priority; & even though I am now an empty-nester, it is still my priority. As such, you might guess that this will be the main topic of this blog. I hope to break this down into the following subjects: cooking, cleaning, nurturing, decorating, organizing, gardening & crafting.
BROOKLYN, N.Y.—Over the weekend, I saw two of the films in the Film Society of Lincoln Center's Cannon Films Canon series: John Cassavetes's Love Streams and Andrei Konchalovsky's Runaway Train. Both films were backed by Cannon Films, a studio run from 1979 onward by Israeli cousins Menahem Golan and Yoram Globus. Golan/Globus were known throughout the 1980s not only for bankrolling a lot of gung-ho action schlock starring Chuck Norris, Charles Bronson and Michael Dudikoff, but also gambling on world-class auteurs like Cassavetes, Jean-Luc Godard and Raúl Ruiz, among others. For that reason, the same studio that brought the world, among other films, the Missing in Action flicks, The Delta Force, Superman IV: The Quest for Peace, Masters of the Universe and others also brought the aforementioned two titles, King Lear, Treasure Island, Barfly and many other classier projects to a wider audience. That's an almost unheard-of contrast, for an American studio at least, between popular entertainment and art-house fare...and frankly, I wish the Film Society had emphasized the contrast that much more in its otherwise interesting series. (Chuck Norris kicking Robert Forster's ass on the same day Jean-Luc Godard purses his lips as Professor Pluggy in King Lear? That'd at least be someone's dream come true!)
BLDGBLOG: Good point.
to distant future, I will shed my own raindrops, longing for it.
But you can still visit the country, hit up the bars and drink loads of beer I suppose. Disturb the peace and all that we do in the rest of the world.
What's Next...
The institution of citizenship is undergoing a period of intense scrutiny in academia and political practice. The widening and deepening of the European Union, the social inclusion of migrant populations and the economic inequalities emphasised by the repercussions of the financial crisis are just a few examples of processes which today urge a renewed assessment of citizenship as a normative ideal and a political project.
Martha Stewart Punch - Hearts - sorry can't remember it's name. I've had it ages and only used twice.
108 ***5. “Vietnam, Insubordination, and Self-Government.” Chicago Tribune, June 25, 1972, sec. 1A, pp. 1-2. Reprinted in Congressional Record, vol. 118, p. 34343; Daily Record, pp. E8414-E8415 (October 10, 1972); and in Congressional Record, vol. 118, p. 34755; Daily Record, pp. E8480-E8481 (October 10, 1972). (Incorporated in Item B-2, above, pp. 151-54, 303-05 (1975).)
This mental health issue is often related to stress. Many people who suffer with anxiety must deal with other disorders as well. Depression is one of the disorders that frequently accompany anxiety.
Brandon Sanderson also completed a trilogy some years ago, Mistborn. Here again, the trilogy could have been the end of that particular 'universe' but he decided to get back to it in the form of a stand-alone set in the future of his created world in The Allow of Law. He also mentioned that he was going to write two more Mistborn trilogies. If he writes the 36 novels he's planning right now, he will be called the master of follow-ups!
Maybe he deserved to have his name cleared but what right does he have to take a handful of innocent people, use them as human shield, terrorize them for a good 11 hours, and then kill them? You do not right a mistake by making another. Certainly, you do not hostage a bus at gun-point and expect the country to believe you, more so have the government listen. That’s just stupid.
Martin Luther King, Jr.’s voice offers more than just inspiration, and his power goes beyond his well-remembered Dream. In his written works, King offers a pragmatic approach to planning, training, and demonstrating that the Occupy protests have yet to develop. He gives detailed explanations of the decisions and strategies behind coordinating a “nonviolent army.”[3] Even the title of his last book, Where Do We Go From Here: Chaos or Community?, speaks to the core of widespread uncertainty about Occupy’s trajectory. Until biological science catches up with Matt Groening’s imagination, connecting with King’s spoken and written voice is the best way to access his nuanced social insights.
Application process: Send cover letter, resume, transcripts and letters of recommendation.
“The Federal Reserve Bank of New York is eager to enter into close relationship with the Bank for International Settlements….The conclusion is impossible to escape that the State and Treasury Departments are willing to pool the banking system of Europe and America, setting up a world financial power independent of and above the Government of the United States….The United States under present conditions will be transformed from the most active of manufacturing nations into a consuming and importing nation with a balance of trade against it.” – Rep. Louis McFadden – Chairman of the House Committee on Banking and Currency quoted in the New York Times (June 1930)
Wednesday 25th April 2012 The Craft Den will also be celebrating its 4th Birthday with lots going on. For more information please contact Lynne at sales@craftden.co.uk
The devotees who attended the Hollywood Festival were from the Radha Krsna temple located at 7 Bury Place, which preceded both Bhaktivedanta Manor and the Soho temple. The devotees were billed under the name “Radha Krishna Temple” at many other music gigs in the UK, as well.
Augustus is our young narrator. He is visiting King's Port, South Carolina, at the request of his Aunt Carola. (She is, in fact, paying for his trip. He's supposed to be diligently researching genealogies and records to see if he can find the "proof" he needs to join her oh-so-exclusive club. Those men and women supposedly descended from royalty. Does he stay on task? What do you think?!) While there, he becomes entangled in a love affair. I'll clarify. He joins a gossip-y group of women who are focusing their attention on John Mayrant. Augustus first impression of John Mayrant is quite interesting. (It is readers' first impression as well.) He is ordering his own wedding cake, a Lady Baltimore cake. He is a bit anxious, a bit shy, a bit nervous. He even forgets to tell the woman at the counter, the baker, the date of his wedding, the date he needs the cake. He has to run back to tell her. Just as she is running to catch him to tell him he's forgotten. As you might guess, as you might imagine, readers see some potential here! The woman is Eliza La Heu. His fiance, Hortense Rieppe, is seen as less than desirable. She's not from the right kind of people, and if she has any money of her own, it's the wrong sort of money. She mixes with the wrong crowds, vacations the wrong places, and smokes! Is this young couple in love? Well, that's the big question, I suppose. And it seems to be everybody's business. Even with this newcomer Augustus getting in the middle of it. Should the engagement be broken? How should it be broken? When should it be broken? Would everyone be better off if it was broken?
You can see more pictures and read about how I made this over on the Pages blog. I am hard at work on next month's projects in between recovering from some major tryptophan overdose!
Its always the starters that I end up leaving for the last minute and invariably not make it at all. Ro keeps telling me its rude to hover around the kitchen when there are guests involved. I admit its rude to cook while they are around, but checking in on stuff in the oven, filling a tart or even frying something is acceptable, especially because these things, if made before hand, loses all the goodness. Which of course is all Greek and Latin to my husband and we end up arguing about it (always and in between all this commotion).
Basically, I realized that it was an important issue to me, I knew nothing about it, and I wanted to become informed so Nick and I could make an educated decision for Logan.
What I liked less.
You all could easily turn up and sing along!
Director : Srikanth Vemulapalli
Why chibchombianos? Because one of the first indigenous groups in Colombia were the chibcha ,of course! And as we all know, indigenous groups are uncivilized, uncultured, backwards, and resistant to change. Not to mention, they throw garbage all over their country.
What are the challenges you experience in living your musical dream.
NOTHING: A visual story with minimal dialogue about a maid, the repetitiveness of life, and an attempt to break free.
Today I colored the Morning Soft image with my copic markers. All of the layers for the image panel are distressed. I then scored the right side of my card base in 3/4" and then another 1/2". I tore a little strip off and accordion folded the folds so that they met. I then added the strip of chocolate chip between the folds, and two brads to keep the fold together.
4. Attachments by Rainbow Rowell
As always I was surprised by the amount of small and stupid mistakes that I had failed to see the on the last edit. Rather unsurprisingly, the changes I wanted to make are coming easily and are fitting into the plot almost effortlessly, proving their worth and rightful place among the story line.
When you feel like your marriage, job, church, friends, etc. have become stuck in an ever-looping rerun of last week; when you feel like something has to change, you are right. But don’t look at what circumstances you can change, and don’t start looking for something new. Maybe, just maybe, what needs to happen is a change of heart. Our attitudes usually need more changing than any circumstance, but how do we usually pray? We pray for situations to change without any thought to our hearts’ need for transformation.
LÄPPLE: He taught Fundamental Theology, and his way of lecturing was very impressive. You could see that he lived and suffered what he was explaining. He came with a slip of paper, with three or four words written on it and then a series of questions. He spoke impromptu, and if some startling idea came to him during the lecture he would get up from the desk and approach the students, to talk to them almost head to head. He came out of philosophy, but then theology had become his destiny, as Ratzinger said in the homily for his funeral. His wasn’t a theology of concepts, but an existential
18 Still Ill
As under a green sea, I saw him drowning.
The guide nodded, clutching a pouch to his chest. “The koldun, yes. If your men did not come back, this is why.” He turned to the three soldiers. “Please, I have shown you – let me go now?”
Sovereign - Blonde ale (3.8% ABV)
If love could be measured it would be elastic and ever changing. It would be a trip to the moon as far as the sun. It would be like a sick body temperature rising and falling.
Breaking out of Cliche
some kind of protein, cut into small pieces if necessary (chicken or tofu, I used shrimp, Jenean has done sea scallops)
Buttons from stash
and go.
--The only things I know about Argentina are that it's very far away, we went to war .. I saw a film where their king appeared to be Jimmy Nail ... the Argentine tango (I've checked with YouTube) is a complex dance, built on instinct, litheness and a non-coy Latin American attitude to sensual proximity to strangers. The fair reading is probably "no clue for me, no clue for you, exotic, kinky, doesn't matter, I'm ok you're ok". It's annoying to see something interesting that I care about talked about in this timewasting, information-free way, but it's a bit self-centred of me to get upset about that.
A dear thing is hope
They now wear portable motors and bags on their backs.
Tomorrow is my last day of grad school classes. It will be bittersweet. Sure, it’s an accomplishment. But I will truly miss my classmates — my friends who make the communications program at The College of Saint Rose so much fun.
Hats - Yestadt Millinery
Tom Cizauskas has identified Harold "Howie" Faircloth III as the original brewer for the Wharf Rat when it opened in 1992. Faircloth would later move on to open the Globe Brewing Co. on Key Highway in 1995, then on to Vermont, brewing at The Shed Brewery and Restaurant in Stowe (closed in late 2011), and now a co-owner of Green Mountain Distillers.
After what seemed would be a third year of dry spells during the critical monsoon season, the rains have finally come in Gaya district of Bihar, India. Agriculture is one of the primary revenue sources for both farmers and wage earners like the 200 households that Grameen Foundation is reaching through the Integrated Livelihoods Model for the Poorest (ILM) pilot project being implemented in partnership with BASIX/The Livelihood School. The rains bring increased wage-earning opportunities, which translates into enhanced income and food security for most poor rural households.
The fact is, some people may be ‘called’ in their Christian faith to minister to the poor in a special way. Others may be called to minister to HIV/AIDS people in a special way. Still others may be called to care for the environment in a special, God-directed way. And I say: GO FOR IT! But not everyone is called to those ministries. Not everyone on this planet is going to be a peace-maker in the above sense of ‘opposing violence in all forms.’ After all, if we did that, we would not be justified because then Christ would not have been killed: There’s a time for peace; and a time for war. Some will be soldiers who bring peace through breaking things and killing bad people who want to kill us. Still others might be called to build harmony among the races through diplomacy and government. But not all.
Finally, Chinese New Year 2012 is just around the corner... To be precise, it is just three days away!
3:20- Brody gets picked up by my sister. She works at the high school a mile away from Brody's school, so it works out perfectly. She takes him home with her and he watches TV or plays outside while she gets her dinner ready.
To my surprise, the most difficult part of this project has been the sentence generators. I often need various algorithms for making the simplest of sentences if I am to achieve the variation I desire. Managing the vapidly named string arrays and the infinitely nested switch statements is one thing, but juggling dozens of algorithms with completely differing structures containing labyrinthine networks of booleans requires more coffee than someone my age aught to be drinking. This is mainly due to how foolishly I name my variables. When someone says “convention”, I reach for my dictionary. Which is odd since I don’t own a dictionary and I am full aware of convention’s meaning, not to say I employ it in the least. My uncle who does Ruby has been trying to get me to put some structure into my naming, but you know how it is with updating instances in For loops; its so tempting to give them single character names.
At least one area not a concern for the team will be their mirrors, which are already cockpit mounted and not subject to the repositioning facing some of their rivals (RBR & Ferrari).
Here are the scanned images of the front of the book and of the first two pages (Sara created teh map cover and back and I did all the inside work - I love her sewn together book):
Daves
The name of my tribe is for me to know and for you to ponder.
8.pirates night
PBR and a shot of Beam.
What is Napoli? From Naples? Did Fannie Farmer ever go to Naples? Or is this her 1896 vision of what she would consume there? Then again this edition of The Fannie Farmer Cookbook was published in the sixties so it may not have even been in the original.
Competitor Group is the group that puts on the Rock’n'Roll (RnR) race series that does marathons and half marathons all over the country. And a 10K in New York City.
God waited patiently for the right time for Christ to be born to bring about the new and perfect worship system where men and women will worship in “truth” and in “Spirit”. Even the apostle Peter struggled with these concepts even after he had first hand witness of what Jesus had said: “Destroy this temple, and in three days I will raise it up.(Joh 2:19)”.
*doing a silly twirly dance* Someone tagged me. ME. =) --And that someone just happens to be the AWESOME Claire Hennessy. (Thank you Claire. I adore you Claire. I'm sending cheese in mass quantities Claire. Um btw, what's your address?)
5 - You have $50 to make the switch to cloth (birthday money, savings, gift, tax return refund, etc)
Active Region 11476 continues to grow in size and magnetic complexity as it rotates further onto the solar disk.
I first came across Hanna's work when we both were exhibiting at Pulse, Earls Court a few years back, I remember talking to her about traveling in from Essex and offering lifts (Hanna is a fellow Essex girl based in Brentwood - quite far from her Scandinavian roots) but unfortunately we didnt keep in touch...
for the peasantry, and he, as sated
The Babri Masjid carnage of 1992.
If you are looking for recovery help, CVCAC is also available to help. There are Flood Recovery Specialists working throughout the state who are available to provide guidance and support to all affected by Irene.
He has masters the art of perfection specially for the bride and the Indian traditional dress that is sarees. Sabyasachi Mukherjee Sarees Collection is amazing and stunning. Sabya’s fashion hitherto has been known for dressing up elegantly the bride on the D-day. amazing saris with the most outstanding embroidery and prints inspired by the handlooms of kolkata and west Bengal are the major works of Sabyasachi.
As to the Rhines AAAS underwater photo from the mid-1970s, it has been criticised by saying the head is not obviously continuous to the neck and that it needs to be aligned in the vertical plane. The critics that say this then go on to re-orientate the photo in the horizontal plane, inverted of its usual orientation. They then say it is a photograph of the bottom. It does not match the other photos more obviously showing the bottom, but the real problem is that saying this destroys their own argument. If the photo is indeed meant to be horizontal, then there is no reason why you need to say it must be vertical, and if it represents the bottom, then the tow parts really are continuous and the apparent break is only a trick of the shadows. Which is what supporters had been saying all along.
If the truth be known, I have, on occasion, ‘felt an alien force in my brain’. It is called ‘over refreshment’ in my case… a bit too much of the juice. But… not partaking today.
Personally, I liked Blizzard Beach a little better than Typhoon Lagoon. We spent a lot of time in the kid's area there with our little guys. The play area had lots of sand to play in and several smaller water slides that even Charlie enjoyed.
I used to beat myself up constantly wishing I had only known, but at the time there was nothing to know.
- and an incident that occured during one of the zamboni periods. Suddenly, as we were sitting and resting our feet during the first re-icing, I noticed that the mass of humanity was moving closer and closer to a certain point by the railing….
In science, establishing something as a fact is a daunting process. First you need convincing experimental data. Then you need to establish the reliability of your data by repeating the experiment several times and getting the same results. Then other scientists will "peer review" your experiment by trying to duplicate the results. Or, more likely, by trying to disprove your results.
My blood is boiling. The Palestinian issue is much at heart. However, the outrageous words the Israeli Ambassador for Malta said, also offend me personally, as a Maltese citizen.
5. Wichita State Shockers
Fixed inductor uses multiple coils of a conducting material to store energy using a magnetic field. It belongs to the electromagnet family. The voltage produced is proportional to the rate of change in current flowing through it. The higher the number of coils and input current, the higher is the inductance.
Pets.
“There is little doubt that rising human consumption of materials is our most seminal environmental challenge,” Ali writes, but he also acknowledges the way in which our lust for material goods—treasure, as he puts it—has shaped human civilization since long before the gold rush. Rather than attempting to reverse this long history of resource use, Ali proposes that we employ our awareness of it to look for creative ways forward.
policy would have on the military.
There's something about the combination of black and cognac that I can't get enough of.
And then, in the distance, in one of the dusty windows, we saw it. We saw Him.
A big psych-salute is due to Nick for his help with this. Coincidentally he'll be back on the blog via a Dear Diary entry later in the year. However - should you fancy catching him in action - he's backing Debbie Duveen and The Millbanks at the Hoxton Underbelly on January 26th - details here and here
If you ladies could kindly email me your addresses (except you Vicki - I have yours!) I will get the books out to you early next week.
no one else does
He despises feet and if he saw this, his face would probably turn white!)
One last thing... I shall get back to regular posts soon. This week I joined the unemployed club so most of my time recently has been spent looking for a new job and trying to figure out ways to conjure up cash (i.e Ebay) so I can survive in the space in between jobs. Thanks for reading everyone and once again your support/feedback is greatly appreciated.
We learned a fabulous traditional book making technique, stitching the pages of the book together. definitely one that, as a bit of a book making fan, I will be trying again.
is difference in perspective.
We were curious to see what had seemingly upset both left and right of the political pallet, and for once I'm more inclined to agree with the lefties as the film surprisingly portrayed Thatcher in a very favourable light.
Papier/Papers: Cardstock: Bazzill (Kraft), Stampin' Up!; Patterned Paper: My Mind's Eye 6"x6" Lost & Found 2 Paper Pad «Sunshine»
